PHANTOM  TRAFFIC 

S.  HRG.  110–1143 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

APRIL  23,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–047 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 23, 2008  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
................................................................................

Statement of Senator Stevens 

WITNESSES 

Henagan,  Raymond,  General  Manager,  Rock  Port  Telephone  Company;  on 
Behalf of the National Telecommunications Cooperative Association  .............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
McKee, Charles W., Director, Government Affairs, Sprint Nextel Corporation  .
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sarjeant,  Lawrence  E.,  Vice  President,  Federal  Legislative  and  Regulatory 
Affairs, Qwest Communications International, Inc.  ..........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Simpson,  Angela,  Director,  Government  Affairs,  Covad  Communications  and 
...................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

President, Voice on The Net (VON Coalition) 

Page 
1 
1 
1 
2 

16 
17 
3 
4 

6 
8 

10 
12 

McCaskill, Hon. Claire, U.S. Senator from Missouri, prepared statement  .........

31 

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

PHANTOM  TRAFFIC 

WEDNESDAY,  APRIL  23,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:30  p.m.,  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The  CHAIRMAN.  This  afternoon  we  deal  with  a  matter  that  is 
rather  complicated,  and  I  would  like  to  commend  the  Vice  Chair-
man of the Committee for bringing this matter up, and he is in the 
process  of  drafting  a  measure  which  I  will  be  cosponsoring.  I  will, 
without objection, yield the floor, yield the chair to the Vice Chair-
man because he is the expert on phantoms. 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. I have very little expertise on phantoms. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
It  is  easy  to  forget  the  small  miracle  of  science  that  takes  place  every  time  you 
pick  up  a  phone  and  make  a  call.  No  matter  where  you  are  in  the  country  and  no 
matter who you are calling, you are connected in a fraction of a second. This is pos-
sible  because  all  telephone  companies  are  required  to  interconnect  with  each  other, 
to  complete  a  phone  call  even  if  the  carrier  has  no  relationship  with  the  calling 
party. 

Historically,  for  the  system  to  work,  phone  companies  have  sought  compensation 
for  the  services  they  provided  to  other  carriers.  Today,  many  telephone  companies 
complain that too many of the calls to their customers arrive lacking signaling infor-
mation  necessary  for  billing  purposes.  This  so  called  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’  financially 
burdens small carriers in particular. 

I  applaud  Vice  Chairman  Stevens’  desire  to  shine  a  light  on  this  issue.  Today’s 
hearing  allows  us  to  explore  the  scope  of  the  problem  caused  by  phantom  traffic. 
It  also  allows  us  to  discuss  legislation  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  intends  to  introduce 
that would direct the Federal Communications Commission to improve its signaling 
rules with respect to the transmission of information necessary for billing purposes. 
I  welcome  the  opportunity  for  the  Committee  to  consider  possible  solutions  to 
phantom  traffic.  As  communications  networks  and  consumer  services  have  evolved 
over  the  past  decade,  the  problem  has  grown  more,  not  less,  complex.  Ultimately, 
we  should  strive  for  rules  that  ensure  fair  compensation  for  all  service  providers 
while encouraging continued innovation and greater network efficiency. 

I look forward to hearing the testimony from today’s witnesses on this issue. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  That  is  just  because  he  never  listened  to  that 
old  radio  program.  Remember  The  Phantom?  That  is  the  problem. 
I  do  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  thank  you  for  scheduling  the 

hearing. I am delighted that we have this series of witnesses. 

Phantom  traffic  is  a  definite  problem  for  rural  carriers  in  our 
home  State  of  Alaska  and  throughout  rural  America.  Alaska  pro-
viders face unique geographic challenges and depend on the ability 
to  accurately  bill  other  carriers  for  delivering  traffic.  However, 
phantom  traffic  prevents  carriers  from  collecting  funds  that  are 
rightfully  owed  to  them  by  other  carriers.  This  in  turn  impacts 
Universal Service and ultimately the telephone rates for customers 
in rural America. 

During  today’s  discussion,  we  will  hear  from  a  diverse  cross  sec-
tion  of  the  industry  representatives.  I  am  hopeful  that  this  discus-
sion will lead to an agreement that carriers should not disguise the 
origination of traffic. 

Some will try to suggest that phantom traffic must be tied up in 
a broader discussion about reforming intercarrier compensation. In 
my  opinion,  that  is  not  necessary.  I  think  resolving  this  issue  will 
make it easier to address those broader issues, but until this issue 
is settled, it will be almost impossible to attempt to solve the other 
problems that we have. 

We  have  heard  about  the  problems  of  phantom  traffic  for  many 
years,  and  I  have  encouraged  the  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission  to  actively  analyze  this  issue.  It  is  time  now  to  try  to  find 
a  solution  and  it  is  time  for  the  FCC  to  pull  back  the  mask  and 
see who or what is behind phantom traffic. 

I  look  forward  to  working  with  my  colleagues  here  on  this  com-
mittee  to  address  the  problem,  and  I  thank  Senator  Inouye,  Sen-
ator  Dorgan,  Senator  Smith,  and  Pryor,  Thune,  and  Snowe  for 
agreeing  to  cosponsor  legislation  that  I  hope  to  introduce  today. 
This  legislation  would  very  simply  require  the  FCC  to  establish 
rules within 12 months imposing a duty on originating carriers, in-
cluding  Voice  over  Internet  Protocol  providers,  as  well  as  inter-
mediate  carriers  to  ensure  that  all  traffic  has  sufficient  signaling 
data  to  enable  accurate  billing.  It  is  unfair  to  the  system  to  have 
some  people  disguise  their  traffic  and  not  pay  for  it  as  others  do. 
In establishing these rules, the FCC should consider at a minimum 
industry standards for signaling, technical implications of signaling 
equipment  currently  being  used  in  industry,  and  costs  incurred  in 
modifying  equipment  to  accommodate  any  changes  that  may  be 
necessary to accurately reflect the origination of any signal. 

And I do thank you as witnesses for participating. I look forward 

to your testimony. 

I  am  sorry  to  be  a  little  bit  late,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  had  about  70 
young  people  from  Alaska  over  there  on  the  steps  of  the  Capitol. 
If  they  had  been  from  New  York,  there  would  have  been  700.  You 
understand. That is a large group for us. 

In  any  event,  I  would  welcome  Charles  McKee,  Director  of  Gov-
ernment  Affairs,  Sprint  Nextel;  and  Mr.  Lawrence  Sarjeant,  Vice 
President, Federal Legislative and Regulatory Affairs of Qwest; Ms. 
Angela  Simpson,  Director  for  Government  and  Regulatory  Affairs 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

of Covad Communications and President of the VON Coalition; and 
Mr.  Raymond  Henagan,  General  Manager  of  the  Rock  Port  Tele-
phone Company. Gentlemen and lady, if it is all right with you, we 
will proceed in that order and call on Mr. McKee first. 

STATEMENT OF CHARLES W. MCKEE, DIRECTOR, 

GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS, SPRINT NEXTEL CORPORATION 
Mr.  MCKEE.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Inouye,  and  Vice  Chair-
man Stevens, and members of the Committee. My name is Charles 
McKee and it is my privilege to be here today. 

On  behalf  of  Sprint,  I  would  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to 
thank Vice Chairman Stevens and Chairman Inouye for your lead-
ership  and  commitment  to  fostering  the  growth  of  the  competitive 
telecommunications  industry  and  for  this  opportunity  to  discuss 
Sprint  Nextel  Corporation’s  perspective  on  the  issue  of  phantom 
traffic. 

Sprint  does  not  condone  fraudulent  activities  of  any  kind,  nor 
does it support activities designed to avoid legitimate compensation 
obligations  between  telecommunications  carriers.  Sprint  does  not 
believe, however, that there is a significant volume of telecommuni-
cations  traffic  that  is  being  manipulated  for  fraudulent  purposes 
and,  accordingly,  does  not  believe  legislation  in  this  area  is  nec-
essary at this time. 

On the contrary, Sprint believes that most disputes characterized 
as  phantom  traffic  are  a  result  of  the  inherent  limitations  of  the 
existing  public  switched  telephone  network  and  ambiguity  regard-
ing  the  legal  status  of  various  types  of  telecommunications  traffic. 
The rates applied for the termination of traffic vary widely, even 
though  the  actual  service  provided,  completion  of  a  call  to  an  end- 
user,  is  largely  identical  in  all  circumstances.  These  varying  rate 
levels  result  in  many  disputes  between  the  billing  and  billed  com-
panies  over  whether  the  correct  rate  level  was  applied  on  a  par-
ticular call and what amount is actually due. Accordingly, it is not 
surprising  that  what  one  carrier  characterizes  as  fraud  another 
carrier would consider entirely appropriate under existing rules. 

The testimony of all the witnesses here today acknowledges that 
there  are  many  different  means  of  exchanging  billing  information 
and  that  the  existing  network  infrastructure  is  inherently  limited 
in its ability to provide billing data even with the best signaling in-
formation. The lack of signaling data can result from many limita-
tions  in  the  network,  such  as  the  existence  of  multiple  tandems  or 
the  limited  signaling  capability  of  a  particular  route,  and  likewise, 
given  that  carriers  do  not  agree  on  what  rate  should  apply  to  cer-
tain types of traffic, such as Voice over Internet Protocol traffic, the 
receipt of signaling information will not resolve those disputes. 

Accordingly, while Sprint does not object to an obligation that all 
telecommunications providers populate appropriate signaling infor-
mation,  Sprint  does  not  believe  this  change  alone  will  address  the 
core causes of today’s billing disputes. 

Given the complex questions that surround these payments, it is 
important  that  any  legislation  in  this  area  be  carefully  crafted  to 
avoid unintended consequences. We, therefore, applaud the narrow 
and  focused  approach  of  this  proposed  bill.  Indeed,  Sprint  would 
encourage  the  Committee  to  expressly  state  that  it  is  not  attempt-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

ing to modify existing intercarrier compensation obligations, for ex-
ample, the manner in which the jurisdiction of traffic is to be deter-
mined  or  the  type  of  network  architecture  required  for  the  ex-
change of traffic. 

Specifically, any legislation should expressly acknowledge that it 
is  not  establishing  a  new  rule  that  called  and  calling  party  num-
bers should always be used to determine the jurisdiction or rate ap-
plicable  to  a  call  for  billing  purposes.  In  this  increasingly  mobile 
world, the use of phone numbers to determine a caller’s location for 
intercarrier  compensation  purposes  does  not  reflect  the  growth  of 
wireless and Voice over Internet Protocol technology. 

Similarly, Sprint urges the Committee to ensure that the legisla-
tion does not require carriers to reengineer their network architec-
ture  in  an  inefficient  and  costly  manner.  Specifically,  the  legisla-
tion  should  make  explicit  that  these  call  identification  obligations 
should  not  require  carriers  to  segregate  different  types  of  traffic 
onto  separate  facilities  or  require  direct  connection  between  car-
riers. Such measures are not necessary to address the issue of bill-
ing and could increase the cost of service to consumers. 

Ultimately, Congress or the FCC must come to terms with these 
broader  issues  of  intercarrier  compensation  that  are  not  being  ad-
dressed  here.  The  existing  system  is  inherently  irrational  and  is 
suppressing  investment  particularly  in  rural  areas.  Reform  of  this 
broken  system  is  critical  to  sustaining  robust  competition  in  the 
telecommunications industry. 

Thank you for your time, and I would be happy to take any ques-

tions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. McKee follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHARLES W. MCKEE, DIRECTOR, GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS, 

SPRINT NEXTEL CORPORATION 

Good afternoon Chairman Inouye and members of the Committee. It is a privilege 
to  be  here  today.  Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  discuss  Sprint  Nextel  Corpora-
tion’s  perspective  on  proposed  legislation  addressing  the  question  of  network  traffic 
identification or ‘‘Phantom Traffic.’’ 

In my testimony today, I will outline Sprint’s understanding of the term Phantom 
Traffic, the significance of this issue to Sprint and the potential consequences of this 
legislation.  Sprint  does  not  condone  fraudulent  activities  of  any  kind,  nor  does  it 
support activities designed to avoid legitimate compensation obligations. Sprint does 
not believe, however, that there is a significant volume of telecommunications traffic 
that falls within these categories and does not believe legislation in this area is nec-
essary  at  this  time.  On  the  contrary,  Sprint  believes  that  most  disputes  regarding 
‘‘Phantom Traffic’’ are a result of inherit limitations of the existing Public Switched 
Telephone  Network  and  ambiguity  regarding  the  legal  status  of  various  types  of 
telecommunications traffic. 

While  Sprint  questions  whether  this  specific  issue  warrants  legislative  action,  it 
applauds  the  narrow  and  focused  nature  of  this  proposed  bill.  Given  the  complex 
questions  that  surround  the  payments  exchanged  between  telephone  companies,  it 
is  important  that  any  legislation  in  this  area  be  carefully  crafted  to  avoid  unin-
tended consequences. This legislation is appropriately limited and appears designed 
to avoid these unintended consequences. Ultimately, however, Congress or the FCC 
must  come  to  terms  with  the  broader  issues  of  intercarrier  compensation  that  are 
not  addressed  here.  Reform  of  this  broken  system  is  critical  to  sustaining  robust 
competition in the telecommunications industry. 
The Meaning of Phantom Traffic 

Under current FCC rules, telecommunications carriers can impose charges on one 
another  when  they  exchange  telecommunications  traffic.  These  charges  vary  based 
upon the type of carrier, the location of the callers, the manner in which the traffic 
is  exchanged  and  the  format  or  protocol  of  the  traffic.  There  are  at  least  nine  dif-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

ferent  classifications  of  rates  between  carriers.  The  rules  governing  these  charges 
are now very complex, and I will not attempt to outline or explain them in this testi-
mony.  For  purposes  of  this  proceeding,  it  is  sufficient  to  state  that  these  charges 
can  only  be  assessed  if  the  carrier  receiving  a  call  from  the  Public  Switched  Tele-
phone Network is able to identify the carrier responsible for payment and the appro-
priate rate to be applied. 

Phantom  Traffic  is  not  a  term  defined  within  the  Communications  Act  or  the 
FCC’s  rules  and  has  been  used  by  different  parties  to  refer  to  different  issues.  Ac-
cordingly,  the  term  itself  is  somewhat  ambiguous  in  nature.  As  Sprint  understands 
the  issue,  however,  ‘‘Phantom  Traffic’’  describes  telecommunications  traffic  that  ei-
ther  lacks  sufficient  information  to  identify  the  carrier  responsible  for  payment  or 
which lacks sufficient information to determine the rate to be applied to the traffic. 
This  lack  of  information  can  be  the  result  of  many  different  causes,  from  the  type 
of  network  used  to  transmit  traffic,  to  disputes  over  the  legal  status  of  the  traffic 
exchanged. 
The Significance of the Issue 

While there are significant disputes over which rates apply and which carriers are 
responsible for payment in various scenarios, almost all carriers recognize that traf-
fic must be identified so that a billing carrier knows where to send its invoices and 
the  rate  to  apply.  This  identification  can  occur  in  different  ways.  Most  commonly, 
carriers use information provided during the transmission of the call using a special 
signaling protocol. This signaling information provides, among other things, the call-
ing  party  number,  the  called  party  number  and,  depending  on  the  type  of  call,  the 
charge  number  (‘‘CN’’).  (It  is  this  network  that  enabled  caller  ID,  for  example).  In-
formation for billing can also be provided after the call is completed through the ex-
change of records between companies. These records frequently identify the respon-
sible  party  based  upon  the  trunk  group  originating  the  traffic.  In  yet  other  situa-
tions,  companies  may  negotiate  payment  factors  based  on  traffic  studies  that  are 
used  to  generate  invoices  based  on  the  total  volume  of  traffic  (as  opposed  to  call- 
by-call records). 

Despite  the  sinister  label,  the  vast  majority  of  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’  is  not  the  result 
of  intentionally  wrongful  or  nefarious  conduct.  Rather  the  lack  of  identifying  infor-
mation or the lack of sufficient information to determine a call’s jurisdiction (or rate) 
is most frequently the result of the current architecture of the Public Switched Tele-
phone  Network,  regulatory  ambiguity  regarding  the  appropriate  rating  and  routing 
of  particular  types  of  traffic,  and  the  creation  of  new  services,  such  as  Voice  over 
Internet Protocol (VoIP), that do not fit neatly within the current rules. 

For  example,  under  current  rules,  the  jurisdiction  or  rate  to  be  applied  to  a  call 
depends,  in  part,  on  the  location  of  the  calling  and  called  party.  In  the  traditional 
wireline  network,  the  location  of  a  party  was  generally  determined  by  their  phone 
number,  which  was  associated  with  a  fixed  address.  With  the  advent  of  mobile 
phones, however, the location of a caller can no longer be determined merely on the 
phone number used. A call from a New York mobile telephone to a traditional Kan-
sas  City  telephone  will  appear  identical  from  the  perspective  of  the  landline  net-
work,  whether  the  caller  was  in  either  New  York  or  Kansas  City.  Likewise,  new 
voice applications using Internet protocol can be initiated on any broadband connec-
tion and may not have a single fixed location. 

In  Sprint’s  experience,  however,  the  amount  of  traffic  that  cannot  be  identified 
through  any  of  the  means  I  previously  mentioned  is  relatively  small.  Wireless  car-
riers, for example, frequently negotiate traffic factors to account for the issue of mo-
bility. These factors require wireless carriers to pay higher rates on a proportion of 
the  traffic  exchanged  with  other  carriers  on  the  assumption  that  some  percentage 
of the calls exchanged were in a different jurisdiction and thus subject to a different 
rate.  These  factors  are  established  based  upon  traffic  studies  that  review  data  over 
a  period  of  days  or  months  rather  than  call-by-call  signaling  information.  Although 
it is not always reliable to determine the location of a wireless caller based only on 
the  called  and  calling  numbers,  the  reality  is  that  most  carriers  have  found  appro-
priate  means  to  measure  and  identify  this  traffic,  and  are  meeting  their  payment 
obligations. 
Consequences of the Legislation 

Sprint  currently  identifies  all  traffic  it  originates  on  the  Public  Switched  Tele-
phone  Network  and  accordingly  does  not  object  to  the  imposition  of  such  an  obliga-
tion  on  other  providers  of  voice  communications.  Indeed,  Sprint  agrees  that  pro-
viders  of  voice  communication  should  not  be  permitted  to  affirmatively  disguise 
their  voice  traffic  or  otherwise  take  steps  to  avoid  a  legal  obligation  to  compensate 
the carriers with whom they exchange traffic. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

Sprint  notes,  however,  that  the  issue  of  traffic  identification  is  closely  related  to 
the  broader  issue  of  intercarrier  compensation.  Indeed,  the  only  reason  to  measure 
traffic  in  this  way  is  in  order  to  impose  charges.  Given  the  complexity  of  that  sub-
ject,  this  legislation  appropriately  avoids  attempting  to  restructure  the  current 
rules.  The  issue  of  intercarrier  compensation  reform  has  been  the  subject  of  thou-
sands  of  pleadings  and  years  of  debate.  Legislation  which  purports  to  address  the 
relatively  narrow  issue  of  ‘‘Phantom  Traffic’’  or  traffic  identification  should  appro-
priately  avoid  addressing  these  larger  questions.  Indeed,  Sprint  would  encourage 
the Senate to clarify that this legislation is not intended to modify the current inter-
carrier compensation rules. 

Specifically,  the  legislation  should  expressly  acknowledge  that  it  is  not  estab-
lishing  a  new  rule  that  called  and  calling  party  numbers  should  always  be  used  to 
determine  the  jurisdiction  or  rate  applicable  to  a  call  for  billing  purposes.  In  this 
increasingly mobile world, the use of phone numbers to determine a caller’s location 
for intercarrier compensation is backward-looking and ignores the trends of wireless 
and Voice over Internet Protocol (‘‘VoIP’’) technology. Until Congress or the FCC are 
prepared  to  address  all  of  the  ramifications  associated  with  changes  in  the  manner 
in  which  calls  are  rated  and  routed,  it  should  avoid  any  action  that  would  further 
distort the current broken system. 

Similarly, Sprint urges the Senate to ensure that the legislation does not require 
carriers  to  re-engineer  their  network  architecture  in  an  inefficient  and  costly  man-
ner.  Specifically,  the  legislation  should  make  explicit  that  these  call  identification 
obligations do not require carriers to segregate different ‘‘types’’ of traffic onto sepa-
rate facilities or require direct connectivity between carriers. Such measures are not 
necessary  to  address  the  issue  of  billing  and  could  increase  the  cost  of  service  to 
consumers.  Sprint  is  concerned,  however,  that  this  legislation  could  be  read  to  re-
quire inefficient trunking arrangements that would disrupt the existing network ar-
chitecture, which currently allows carriers to combine traffic of different types or ju-
risdictions  on  the  same  facilities.  While  Sprint  does  not  believe  this  is  the  intent 
of  the  legislation,  we  urge  the  Senate  to  carefully  review  the  language  in  this  con-
text. 
Future Reform 

Once  again,  Sprint  commends  the  Senate  staff  for  crafting  such  narrow  legisla-
tion.  Sprint  does  not  condone  fraudulent  efforts  to  mask  a  carrier’s  identity  or  to 
avoid  compensation  obligations.  Sprint,  however,  does  not  believe  the  specific  issue 
of Phantom Traffic currently warrants legislation. While Sprint can support narrow 
legislation addressing traffic identification, we urge the Senate to avoid unintended 
changes to the already complex and dysfunctional intercarrier compensation regime. 
Unfortunately,  the  issue  of  intercarrier  compensation,  including  both  switched 
and special access, is not one that can be avoided much longer if viable competition 
is  to  remain  in  the  telecommunications  marketplace.  The  distortions  in  the  current 
system that heavily favor incumbent carriers and outdated technologies threaten to 
undermine the successes of the 1993 and 1996 revisions to the Telecommunications 
Act. Sprint strongly urges Congress to address these broader issues as soon as pos-
sible. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you, Mr. McKee. 
Mr. Sarjeant, who is the Vice President of Legislative Affairs for 

Qwest, please. 
STATEMENT  OF  LAWRENCE  E.  SARJEANT,  VICE  PRESIDENT, 
FEDERAL LEGISLATIVE AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS, QWEST 
COMMUNICATIONS INTERNATIONAL, INC. 
Mr.  SARJEANT.  Good  afternoon,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Mr.  Vice  Mr. 
Chairman.  My  name  is  Lawrence  Sarjeant,  and  I  am  Vice  Presi-
dent,  Federal  Legislative  and  Regulatory  Affairs  for  Qwest.  Qwest 
thanks the Committee for focusing attention on the phantom traffic 
issue  by  holding  this  hearing,  and  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to 
share Qwest’s views on phantom traffic with you. 

Qwest  provides  local  telephone  service,  broadband  Internet  ac-
cess  service,  and  VoIP  service  in  14  states  that  cross  three  U.S. 
time  zones.  Qwest  also  operates  a  long  distance  network  and  one 
of the world’s largest Internet backbones. Qwest provides a variety 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

of  other  telecommunications  and  information  services  on  a  nation-
wide basis for businesses and state and Federal Government agen-
cies. In providing these services, Qwest utilizes a network that con-
sists  of  both  traditional  public  switched  telephone  network,  PSTN, 
facilities  and  state-of-the-art  broadband  and  other  IP-based  facili-
ties. 

Qwest  commits  considerable  investment  capital  and  other  re-
sources  on  an  annual  basis  to  operate  and  maintain  its  facilities. 
For  example,  Qwest  invested  $800  million  in  2007  to  augment  the 
broadband  capabilities  of  its  network,  including  delivering  higher 
speeds  to  all  of  its  sales  channels.  This  was  a  part  of  the  approxi-
mately  $1.67  billion  in  total  Qwest  capital  investment  for  2007. 
Further,  Qwest  recently  announced  a  planned  2008  capital  invest-
ment of $300 million to extend fiber optics deeper into its local net-
work supporting Internet access services. 

Given the breadth and diversity of its services and the size of its 
capital  investment,  Qwest  cares  deeply  about  ensuring  that  the 
public policy environment in which it operates is one that is invest-
ment-friendly.  This  is  certainly  a  primary  focus  of  the  1996  Tele-
communications  Act  as  evidenced  by  the  specific  requirement  in 
section  157  that  the  Federal  Communications  Commission,  the 
FCC,  encourage  the  deployment  on  a  reasonable  and  timely  basis 
of advanced telecommunications capability to all Americans by uti-
lizing regulating methods that remove barriers to infrastructure in-
vestment.  It  is  this  goal  of  bringing  advanced  telecommunications 
capability  to  all  Americans  that  should  guide  our  communications 
policy deliberations and actions. 

Unfortunately, the communications industry is experiencing a se-
rious  problem  with  certain  industry  participants  avoiding  their 
intercarrier  compensation  obligations  to  those  carriers  that  own 
and  operate  the  PSTN.  If  legitimate  intercarrier  compensation 
costs  cannot  be  recovered  because  of  such  arbitrage,  less  capital  is 
available for future network investments and consumers lose. 

The term ‘‘phantom traffic’’ describes a number of different situa-
tions  in  which  traffic  is  not  adequately  identified,  making  appro-
priate billing for the traffic difficult or impossible. This happens for 
a  variety  of  reasons,  but  generally  it  occurs  because  the  current 
intercarrier  compensation  regime  has  not  kept  pace  with  techno-
logical and competitive changes in the communications market and, 
as a result, has made certain arbitrage opportunities possible. 

In  today’s  communications  world,  both  traditional  telecommuni-
cations  carriers  and  service  providers  utilizing  more  recent  tech-
nologies  depend  upon  the  ability  to  interconnect  with  one  another 
and exchange traffic. Because the exchange of traffic sometimes in-
volves  different  types  of  services  that  are  accorded  different  regu-
latory 
is  accomplished 
through a variety of arrangements. 

intercarrier  compensation 

treatment, 

In  any  arrangement  where  service  providers  must  compensate 
each other, it is essential that they negotiate agreements that spell 
out  the  terms  and  conditions  by  which  they  exchange  traffic  and 
that  they  also  exchange  adequate  call  data  to  enable  accurate  bill-
ing. Phantom traffic occurs in part because not all service providers 
obtain adequate agreements that ensure that other carriers receive 
the call data necessary for billing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

Qwest  and  others  have  asked  that  the  FCC  address  phantom 
traffic  on  an  interim  basis,  one,  by  reinforcing  that  the  1996 
Telecom  Act  requires  and  enables  all  types  of  service  providers  to 
enter  into  agreements  for  the  exchange  of  traffic,  and  two,  by  ex-
panding  the  scope  of  the  FCC’s  rules  that  require  the  passage  of 
information necessary for accurate billing. 

Call  records.  The  exchange  of  call  records  pursuant  to  an  agree-
ment provides information to facilitate billing and is in fact the in-
dustry  standard  and  the  most  common  way  in  which  information 
is  exchanged  for  billing  purposes.  While  service  providers  are  al-
ready  able  to  negotiate  commercial  terms  for  the  exchange  of  call 
records  as  a  part  of  their  agreements,  they  all  too  often  fail  to  ob-
tain agreements in the first place and, when they do obtain agree-
ments, sometimes fail to negotiate for the necessary call records. 

Signaling  rules.  Signaling  is  just  one  method  of  passing  some  of 
the information necessary for accurate billing, and the existing call 
signaling  rules  were  targeted  to  a  narrow  subset  of  traffic,  inter-
state  traffic  using  the  most  common,  traditional  public  switched 
telephone  network  signaling  protocol.  As  the  communications  mar-
ketplace becomes increasingly diverse and PSTN-based services be-
come  a  complement  to  a  variety  of  non-PSTN-based  services,  it  is 
necessary to expand the FCC’s signaling rules. 

Qwest believes that comprehensive intercarrier compensation re-
form  that  creates  a  holistic  bill-and-keep-at-the-edge  regime  for  all 
traffic is the only true and complete solution to the phantom traffic 
problem.  Nonetheless,  expeditious  adoption  of  an  interim  solution 
addressing agreements and signaling rules is an important step in 
mitigating the phantom traffic problem. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Sarjeant follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LAWRENCE E.  SARJEANT,  VICE PRESIDENT,  FEDERAL 
LEGISLATIVE AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS, QWEST COMMUNICATIONS INTERNATIONAL, 
INC. 
Good  morning  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Law-
rence  Sarjeant,  and  I  am  Vice  President  for  Federal  Legislative  and  Regulatory  Af-
fairs for Qwest Communications International, Inc. (Qwest). I appreciate the oppor-
tunity  to  share  Qwest’s  views  with  you  at  today’s  hearing  on  the  issue  of  phantom 
traffic. 

Before  I  address  the  phantom  traffic  issue  directly,  I  just  want  to  give  a  little 
background about who Qwest is and why we care so much about this issue. As you 
may  know,  Qwest  provides  local  telephone  service,  broadband  Internet  access  serv-
ice,  and  VoIP  (voice  services  using  an  IP  protocol)  service  in  fourteen  states  across 
the Central, Mountain and Pacific time zones. Qwest also operates a long-haul long 
distance network and operates one of the world’s largest Internet backbones. Qwest 
also  provides  a  variety  of  other  telecommunications  and  information  services  on  a 
nation-wide basis (i.e., both inside and outside of its local service area). These serv-
ices  include  VoIP  service  and  a  broad  variety  of  other  innovative  telecommuni-
cations  solutions  provided  to  businesses  and  state  and  Federal  Government  agen-
cies. In providing these services, Qwest utilizes a network that consists of both tra-
ditional  Public  Switched  Telephone  Network  (PSTN)  facilities  and  state-of-the-art 
broadband  and  other  IP-based  facilities.  Qwest  commits  considerable  investment 
capital and other resources on an annual basis to operate and maintain these facili-
ties. By way of example, Qwest invested approximately $800 million in 2007 to aug-
ment  the  broadband  capabilities  of  its  network,  including  delivering  higher  speeds 
to  all  of  its  sales  channels.1 This  was  a  part  of  the  approximately  $1.67  billion  in 

1 As stated in the Earnings Release for Qwest’s 4th Quarter and Full-Year 2007 results. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

total Qwest capital investment for 2007.2 On top of that, Qwest recently announced 
a planned 2008 capital investment of $300 million to extend fiber optics deeper into 
its local network supporting state-of-the-art Internet services.3 
Promoting  an 

Investment-friendly,  Consumer-friendly,  Market-based 

Environment 

Given the breadth and scope of its services and the size of its capital investment, 
Qwest  cares  deeply  about  ensuring  that  the  public  policy  environment  in  which  it 
operates  is  one  that  is  investment  friendly.  This  is  certainly  a  primary  focus  of  the 
1996  Telecommunications  Act,  as  evidenced  by  the  specific  requirement  in  Section 
157  that  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  (the  ‘‘FCC’’)  ‘‘encourage  the  de-
ployment  on  a  reasonable  and  timely  basis  of  advanced  telecommunications  capa-
bility  to  all  Americans  . . .  by  utilizing  . . .  regulating  measures  that  remove  bar-
riers  to  infrastructure  investment.’’  It  is  this  goal  of  bringing  advanced  tele-
communications  capability  to  all  Americans  that  should  guide  our  communications 
policy  deliberations  and  actions.  Policies  that  discourage  investment  in  communica-
tions  infrastructure  by  making  such  investment  uneconomic  operate  at  cross-pur-
poses  with  the  goal  of  encouraging  the  timely  and  ubiquitous  deployment  of  ad-
vanced communications capability to all Americans. Phantom traffic bears on a car-
rier’s  ability  to  make  investments  in  advanced  telecommunications  capabilities  by 
depriving  it  of  the  compensation  it  is  due  for  handling  the  traffic  of  other  commu-
nications  providers.  We  are  experiencing  a  serious  problem  with  certain  industry 
participants  avoiding  their  intercarrier  compensation  obligations  to  those  carriers 
that own and operate the PSTN. Facilities-based providers of communications serv-
ices  such  as  Qwest  have  high  fixed  costs.  If  we  cannot  recover  our  legitimate  costs 
because  of  such  arbitrage,  less  capital  is  available  to  us  for  future  network  invest-
ments to achieve the Congress’s goal of bringing advanced telecommunications capa-
bility to all Americans. If this happens, consumers lose. Qwest commends the Com-
mittee  for  its  interest  in  this  issue  and  shining  a  spotlight  on  it  by  holding  this 
hearing. 
The Phantom Traffic Problem 

The  term  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’  describes  a  number  of  different  situations  in  which 
traffic is not adequately identified, making appropriate billing for the traffic difficult 
or  impossible.  This  happens  for  a  variety  of  reasons,  but  generally  occurs  because 
the  current  intercarrier  compensation  regime  has  not  kept  pace  with  technological 
and  competitive  changes  in  the  communications  market,  and  as  a  result,  has  made 
certain  arbitrage  opportunities  possible.  In  today’s  telecommunications  world,  both 
traditional  telecommunications  carriers  and  service  providers  utilizing  more  recent 
technologies all depend upon the ability to interconnect with one another. The inter-
carrier compensation regime, in turn, governs the manner in which interconnecting 
communications  service  providers  give  or  receive  compensation  when  these  service 
providers  exchange  traffic.  Because  the  exchange  of  traffic  sometimes  involves  dif-
ferent types of services that are accorded different regulatory treatment, intercarrier 
compensation  is  accomplished  through  a  variety  of  arrangements.  In  some  cir-
cumstances,  service  providers  agree  to  exchange  no  compensation  while  accepting 
each other’s traffic. This is called ‘‘bill and keep.’’ In other cases, local exchange car-
riers  exchange  or  carry  traffic  pursuant  to  tariffs  or  carrier  agreements  that  define 
the  terms  and  conditions  for  the  provision  of  compensation.  For  long  distance  serv-
ices, there are both interstate and intrastate tariffed access charge regimes that are 
regulated  by  the  FCC  and  state  public  service  commissions,  respectively.  Under 
these regimes, long distance carriers typically pay local exchange carriers to deliver 
and  receive  long  distance  calls  to  and  from  local  customers.  Among  competing  local 
exchange  carriers,  there  are  the  reciprocal  compensation  rules,  which  allow  a  local 
exchange carrier to be compensated by another local exchange carrier for the termi-
nation of local traffic. When wireless carriers exchange traffic with wireline carriers, 
there are yet additional rules. In some cases, traffic merely transits an intermediate 
carrier’s network, but the transit provider neither originates nor terminates the call. 
In  any  compensation  arrangement  where  service  providers  must  compensate  each 
other,  it  is  essential  that  they  not  only  negotiate  agreements  that  spell  out  the 
terms  and  conditions  by  which  they  exchange  traffic,  but  that  they  also  exchange 
adequate call data to enable accurate billing. 

Phantom traffic occurs, in part, because not all service providers obtain adequate 
agreements  that  ensure  that  other  carriers  receive  the  call  data  necessary  for  bill-
ing,  particularly  in  those  circumstances  where  the  call  signaling  data  is  not  ade-

2 Id. 
3 As stated in the Earnings Release for Qwest’s 3rd Quarter of 2007 results. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

quate. Moreover, because intercarrier compensation treatment varies by jurisdiction, 
some  service  providers  have  the  incentive  to  engage  in  arbitrage  when  they  ex-
change traffic. For example, because interstate access rates are typically lower than 
intrastate  access  rates,  access  traffic  is  sometimes  erroneously  designated  as  inter-
state  when  in  fact  it  is  jurisdictionally  intrastate.  Similarly,  access  traffic  is  some-
times erroneously designated as local traffic because intercarrier compensation rates 
for  local  traffic  are  lower  and/or  because  such  a  designation  improperly  seeks  to 
shift  the  compensation  burden  to  another  carrier  (e.g.,  an  originating  carrier  may 
be  due  compensation  for  access  traffic  but  owe  compensation  for  local  traffic).  In 
other  words,  phantom  traffic  occurs  because  certain  service  providers  seek  to  pay 
less  than  they  should,  seek  to  avoid  their  compensation  obligations  altogether,  or 
seek to receive compensation when they should be paying. Regardless of how it hap-
pens, phantom traffic is a large problem. Estimates as to the amount of revenue lost 
annually  to  phantom  traffic  have  varied  in  filings  in  the  FCC’s  intercarrier  com-
pensation  proceeding  (Docket  WC  No.  01–92)  from  $600M  to  $2B.  The  FCC  is  cur-
rently  studying  potential  intercarrier  compensation  reform  proposals  that  would 
largely address this problem by eliminating differences in intercarrier compensation 
treatment  based  on  the  type  of  traffic.  However,  it  may  be  some  time  before  com-
prehensive intercarrier compensation reform occurs. Because of this, Qwest and nu-
merous  other  industry  representatives  are  encouraging  the  FCC  to  at  least  adopt 
interim  measures  that  would  provide  significant  relief  from  the  phantom  traffic 
problem. 
Qwest’s Phantom Traffic Position 

Qwest  and  a  diverse  group  of  industry  representatives  have  asked  that  the  FCC 
address  phantom  traffic  on  an  interim  basis  by:  (1)  reinforcing  that  the  1996  Act 
requires  and  enables  all  types  of  service  providers  to  enter  into  agreements  for  the 
exchange of traffic; and (2) expanding the scope of FCC rules requiring the passage 
of  information  necessary  for  accurate  billing.  The  first  principle  is  important  be-
cause signaling is just one method of passing some of the information necessary for 
accurate  billing.  The  exchange  of  call  records  pursuant  to  agreement  also  provides 
information  to  facilitate  billing  and  is,  in  fact,  the  industry  standard  and  the  most 
common  way  in  which  information  is  exchanged  for  billing  purposes.  While  service 
providers  are  already  able  to  negotiate  commercial  terms  for  the  exchange  of  these 
call records as part of their agreements, they all too often fail to obtain agreements 
in the first place and, when they do, fail to negotiate for the necessary call records. 
The  second  principle  is  important  because  the  FCC’s  existing  call  signaling  rules 
were  targeted  to  a  narrow  subset  of  traffic—i.e.,  interstate  traffic  using  the  most 
common  traditional  PSTN  signaling  protocol.  The  rules  do  not  cover,  for  example, 
voice  calls  originated  in  IP  protocol  which  terminate  on  the  PSTN.  As  the  commu-
nications  marketplace  becomes  increasing  diverse  and  PSTN-based  services  become 
a complement to a variety of non-PSTN-based services, it is necessary to expand the 
FCC’s signaling rules. 

Again, Qwest believes that the best interim solution to phantom traffic is to mere-
ly  expand  the  scope  of  current  rules  as  discussed  above.  To  be  clear,  given  the  na-
ture  of  the  arbitrage  problem  underlying  phantom  traffic,  Qwest  believes  that  com-
prehensive intercarrier compensation reform that creates a holistic bill-and-keep-at- 
the edge regime for all traffic is the only true and complete solution to the phantom 
traffic  problem.  The  solution  described  above,  addressing  agreements  and  signaling 
rules,  is  only  an  interim  step.  But,  it  is  an  important  step,  and  Qwest  hopes  it  can 
be taken expeditiously. 

Thank you. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
The  next  witness  is  Ms.  Angela  Simpson,  Director  for  Govern-
ment  and  Regulatory  Affairs  of  Covad  Communications  and  Presi-
dent of the VON Coalition. Ms. Simpson? 
STATEMENT OF ANGELA SIMPSON, DIRECTOR, GOVERNMENT 

AFFAIRS, COVAD COMMUNICATIONS; AND PRESIDENT, 

VOICE ON THE NET (VON COALITION) 

Ms. SIMPSON. Thank you, Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Ste-
vens.  My  name  is  Angela  Simpson.  I  am  Director  of  Government 
Affairs  at  Covad  Communications  and  the  President  of  the  VON 
Coalition. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

I  am  proud  to  be  here  representing  a  group  of  high-tech 
innovators  who  are  ushering  in  a  new  world  of  communication  op-
portunity. We believe VoIP can be a force for increased competition 
and  innovation  and  a  driver  for  broadband  deployment  and  eco-
nomic  growth.  With  the  right  policies,  VoIP  competition  can  save 
consumers  billions  of  dollars  over  the  next  several  years,  and  as 
the  Nation  faces  economic  challenges,  VoIP  is  now  projected  to  be 
the number one job creator of any industry in the country. But this 
promise and potential are at risk if rules of the last century’s tele-
phone network are arbitrarily imposed onto the Internet. 

Phantom  traffic  is  a  somewhat  sinister  sounding  phrase  coined 
by  some  incumbent  phone  companies  to  refer  to  traffic  that  may 
not  conform  to  the  billing  methods  used  by  those  carriers.  In  es-
sence,  such  traffic  confuses  the  terminating  carrier  because  the 
traffic may not contain information that the legacy system can eas-
ily  handle.  Some  attribute  fraudulent  motives  to  phantom  traffic, 
but  it  is  inaccurate  to  view  all  phantom  traffic  as  fraud  or  theft. 
There  are  other  innocent  and  valid  reasons  for  this  phenomenon. 
Namely,  the  current  compensation  scheme  does  not  reflect  the 
technological  realities  of  today’s  communications  market.  Many 
new  technologies  like  some  VoIP  services  have  no  business  reason 
to track information in the traditional way, and to do so would re-
quire  extensive  and  costly  network  modifications  simply  to  gen-
erate artificial information. 

While VoIP technologies may not be the primary cause of the so- 
called phantom traffic problem, some of the proposed solutions put 
forth  have  very  real  potential  to  stall  emerging  VoIP  benefits  and 
limit  consumer  choices.  For  these  reasons,  the  VON  Coalition  re-
spectfully  urges  policymakers  to  carefully  consider  two  key  prin-
ciples before acting on phantom traffic. 

First, to help accelerate the transition to a nationwide broadband 
network,  we  believe  regulators  should  create  technologically  neu-
tral  incentives  rather  than  disincentives  for  exchanging  traffic  be-
tween Internet networks and the legacy phone network. 

And second, rather than reflexively applying yesterday’s rules to 
tomorrow’s  technologies,  we  encourage  the  Committee  to  take  a 
practical, forward-looking approach that extends VoIP-driven bene-
fits throughout the economy. 

Those  who  seek  quick  action  on  the  narrow  issue  of  phantom 
traffic  might  create  the  short-term  appearance  of  solving  a  prob-
lem, but the related fallout is likely to have significant, unintended 
negative  consequences.  The  best  approach  is  for  policy  experts  at 
the FCC and stakeholders to eliminate the phantom traffic issue by 
enforcing  existing  rules  and  establishing  a  new  compensation  re-
gime that fosters fair competition. 

Many  proposed  solutions  to  the  phantom  traffic  phenomenon 
tend to tie together the signaling issue, the identification of the IP 
voice packet, and the compensation issue. This is neither necessary 
nor  advisable.  A  combination  of  FCC  enforcement  of  its  current 
rules,  minor  changes  in  the  current  call  signaling  requirements, 
and  completion  of  the  broader  FCC  policymaking  provides  a  far 
more rational solution. 

It is also important to note that some legacy carriers themselves 
bear  a  part  of  the  blame  for  the  phantom  traffic  issue  where  they 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

have  not  updated  their  networks  to  accommodate  SS7  technology. 
Before imposing burdensome, new technical and regulatory require-
ments  on  the  entire  VoIP  industry,  those  carriers  should  be  re-
quired to make the necessary updates to their networks to be able 
to handle the existing signaling information. 

We are concerned that proponents of new traffic signaling regula-
tion have not adequately demonstrated a quantifiable problem that 
cannot  be  addressed  through  better  enforcement  of  existing  rules. 
This is a necessary precondition for any additional actions. Any fix 
should also consider impacts on other laws, broadband deployment, 
and  the  regulation  of  the  Internet  in  general.  There  is  no  need  to 
conduct open heart surgery to fix a paper cut. 

Regardless  of  the  path  taken,  however,  the  VON  Coalition  be-
lieves that no one should have the right to block allegedly improp-
erly labeled traffic. Because such action is blatantly discriminatory, 
policymakers  should  never  tolerate  or  permit  blocking  of  IP  traffic 
under any circumstances. 

The VON Coalition believes that acting on an ad hoc basis at this 
stage  is  unwarranted.  However,  to  the  extent  that  this  committee 
does  act,  it  should  focus  its  initial  efforts  on  quantifying  the  scope 
of  the  phantom  traffic  problem.  This  is  a  legitimate  debate.  The 
risks  associated  with  retrofitting  outdated  technological  and  com-
pensation regimes onto bold, new communications tools vastly out-
weigh  the  temporary  financial  rewards  some  of  these  ILEC’s  seek. 
VoIP  technology  has  benefited  people  across  America  from  cities 
to suburbs to exurbs, and it has been especially important for con-
sumers living in rural America who are just now beginning to enjoy 
the  benefits  of  broadband  and  voice  competition.  Facilitating 
Internet- based voice communication can help all consumers to ben-
efit from voice competition and innovation. It can also help commu-
nities connect to a new world of remote job opportunities, resulting 
in  rural  economies  becoming  an  engine  for  higher  paying  informa-
tion age jobs. 

However, imposing rules meant for yesterday’s phone network on 
tomorrow’s  digital  age  would  adversely  affect  these  vast  consumer 
benefits.  We  urge  the  Committee  to  take  extreme  caution  in  how 
it proceeds with this phantom problem. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Simpson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ANGELA SIMPSON, DIRECTOR, GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS, 
COVAD COMMUNICATIONS; AND PRESIDENT, VOICE ON THE NET (VON COALITION) 
Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  distinguished  mem-
bers  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Angela  Simpson.  I  am  Director  of  Government 
Affairs  at  Covad  Communications  and  President  of  the  Voice  on  The  Net  or  VON 
Coalition 1—the  voice  for  the  VoIP  industry.  On  behalf  of  the  VON  Coalition,  I 

1 The  Voice  on  the  Net  or  VON  Coalition  consists  of  leading  VoIP  companies,  on  the  cutting 
edge of developing and delivering voice innovations over Internet. The coalition, which includes 
AT&T,  BT  Americas,  CallSmart,  Cisco,  CommPartners,  Covad,  EarthLink,  Google,  iBasis,  i3 
Voice  and  Data,  Intel,  Microsoft,  New  Global  Telecom,  PointOne,  Pulver.com,  Skype,  T-Mobile 
USA,  USA  Datanet,  and  Yahoo!  works  to  advance  regulatory  policies  that  enable  Americans  to 
take  advantage  of  the  full  promise  and  potential  of  VoIP.  The  Coalition  believes  that  with  the 
right  public  policies,  Internet-based  voice  advances  can  make  talking  more  affordable,  busi-
nesses  more  productive,  jobs  more  plentiful,  the  Internet  more  valuable,  and  Americans  more 
safe and secure. For more information, see http://www.von.org. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

thank  the  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the 
so-called phantom traffic issue. 

I am proud to be here representing a group of high-tech innovators who are help-
ing  to  usher  in  a  new  world  of  communications  opportunity.  We  believe  VoIP  can 
be  a  force  for  increased  competition,  a  platform  for  innovation,  a  driver  for 
broadband  deployment,  and  a  vehicle  for  continued  economic  growth.  In  fact,  with 
the  right  policies,  VoIP  competition  can  save  consumers  an  astounding  $111  billion 
over the next 5 years—putting real money back into consumers’ pockets through the 
power  of  competition  at  a  time  when  families  really  need  it.2 And  by  harnessing 
VoIP  as  a  broadband  driver,  just  a  7  percent  increase  in  broadband  adoption  could 
create  an  estimated  2.4  million  new  jobs.3 Indeed,  as  the  Nation  faces  economic 
challenges,  VoIP  is  now  projected  to  be  the  number  one  job  creator  of  any  industry 
in the country.4 

But the promise and potential that I outlined above are at risk if rules meant for 
the last century’s telephone network are arbitrarily imposed on to the Internet. This 
would not only stall and stifle these vast consumer and small business benefits, but 
it  runs  counter  to  the  course  the  Committee  has  charted  over  the  years  to  promote 
competition, investment, and innovation. 

‘‘Phantom  traffic’’  is  a  somewhat  sinister-sounding  phrase  used  by  some  incum-
bent  phone  companies  to  refer  to  communications  traffic  that  does  not  conform  to 
the  billing  methodologies  used  by  those  terminating  LECs.  In  essence,  such  traffic 
‘‘confuses’’  the  terminating  carrier’s  systems  because,  in  some  instances,  the  traffic 
does  not  contain  information  that  the  legacy  carrier’s  system  utilizes  to  determine 
the  traffic’s  regulatory  classification  for  compensation  purposes.  Some  read  fraudu-
lent  motives  into  phantom  traffic  by  suggesting  that  the  originators  affirmatively 
alter or remove the information necessary for intercarrier compensation billing pur-
poses in order to make traffic appear to be the type of traffic that is assessed lower 
termination  fees.  But  it  is  inaccurate  and  simplistic  to  view  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’  as 
fraud or theft. There are other, innocent and valid reasons for the ‘‘phantom traffic’’ 
phenomenon. 

Namely, the current compensation scheme does not reflect the technological reali-
ties of today’s communications market. Many new technologies, like some VoIP serv-
ices,  have  no  business  reason  to  track  such  information  in  the  traditional  way  that 
the ILECs would prefer. And to do so would require extensive network modifications 
simply  to  generate  artificial  information.  For  example,  many  innovative  Internet- 
based  communication  services  and  technologies  are  not  tied  inextricably  to  North 
American  Numbering  Plan  (‘‘NANP’’)  numbers,  which  are  the  foundation  of  many 
intercarrier  compensation  calculations.  In  other  instances,  the  consumer  is  simply 
utilizing  the  full  range  of  features  of  a  technology,  whether  IP-enabled  or  wireless, 
such  as  using  a  communications  device  to  originate  calls  from  locations  unrelated 
to the calling party number. 

While VoIP technologies may not be the primary cause of so-called phantom traf-
fic problems, some of the proposed ‘‘solutions’’ put forth have the very real potential 
to  stall  the  vast  emerging  benefits  and  limit  consumer  choices  in  the  future.  For 
these reasons, the VON Coalition respectfully urges the Committee to carefully con-
sider two key principles before it advances any legislation related to phantom traffic 
that might forestall these vast consumer benefits: 

• First,  to  help  accelerate  the  transition  to  a  nationwide  broadband  network,  we 
believe  regulators  should  adopt  rules  that  create  technologically  neutral  incen-
tives rather than disincentives for exchanging traffic between Internet networks 
and  the  legacy  phone  network.  This  means  strengthening  and  reforming  inter-
connection and intercarrier compensation policies as a whole. 
• Second,  rather  than  automatically  applying  yesterday’s  rules  to  tomorrow’s 
technologies,  we  encourage  the  Committee  to  support  a  practical,  forward-look-
ing  approach  that  empowers  consumers,  extends  VoIP  driven  benefits,  and 
boosts productivity in the economy. Extreme caution should be taken to not un-
duly  impede  the  FCC’s  comprehensive  intercarrier  compensation  reform  efforts 

2 Micra  report  (available  online  at  http://www.micradc.com/news/publications/pdfs/Up-
datedlMiCRAlReportlFINAL.pdf) found that VoIP competition can save consumers $111 bil-
lion over the next 5 years. 

3 Just a 7 percent increase in broadband adoption could result in an additional 2.4 million jobs 
per  year  created.  See  http://www.connectednation.com/documents/2008l02l21lTheEco 
nomicImpactofStimulatingBroadbandNationallylAConnected Nation Reportl001.pdf. 

4 The  industry  leading  the  way  in  terms  of  employment  growth  over  the  next  few  years  will 
be Voice over Internet Protocol providers (VoIP), according to economic research firm IBISWorld, 
with  average  annualized  jobs  growth  of  around  19.4  percent  through  2012.  See  http:// 
www.ibisworld.com/pressrelease/pressrelease.aspx?prid=116. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

currently underway and to avoid the serious unintended negative consequences 
that  could  arise  by  virtue  of  a  reflexive  ‘‘band-aid’’  fix  to  the  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’ 
issue. 

We are concerned that a ‘‘shoot then aim’’ approach to solving the so-called phan-
tom traffic issue could have the unintended effect of stifling innovation and stalling 
investment in this still nascent IP-enabled communications industry. Those who ad-
vocate  for  quick  action  on  the  narrow  issue  of  phantom  traffic  might  create  the  ap-
pearance  of  solving  a  problem,  but  the  related  fallout  is  likely  to  have  significant 
and  unintended  negative  repercussions.  For  example,  a  band-aid  fix  imposed  on 
VoIP services is likely not to adequately solve the problem experienced by the LECs, 
and  will  disproportionately  harm  VoIP  providers  and  their  consumers.  A  better  ap-
proach  is  for  policy  experts  at  the  FCC  and  industry  stakeholders  to  eliminate  this 
phantom traffic issue once and for all by establishing a new intercarrier compensa-
tion regime that fosters fair competition and innovation to the benefit of consumers 
and  small  businesses  nationwide.  The  FCC  has  the  tools  and  the  appropriate  au-
thority  to  develop  the  balanced,  pro-competitive,  and  forward-looking  policies  that 
are  needed  here.  Indeed,  the  FCC  opened  such  proceeding  in  2001,  but  has  yet  to 
act  partly  because  they  are  overwhelmed  by  a  tidal  wave  of  petitions  seeking  to 
eliminate statutory interconnection obligations. 
I.  Proposed  Phantom  Traffic  ‘‘Solutions’’  Confirm  the  Failures  of  the 

Current Compensation Structure 

Many  proposed  solutions  to  the  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’  phenomenon  tend  to  inex-
tricably tie together the signaling issue and the compensation issue. This is neither 
necessary  nor  advisable,  especially  if  Congress  or  the  FCC  is  contemplating  an  in-
terim  solution.  A  combination  of  vigilant  FCC  enforcement  of  its  current  rules,  po-
tentially  minor  changes  in  signaling  requirements,  and  completion  of  broader  FCC 
policymaking provide far more rational solutions.5 

There  are  two  distinct  issues  that  proponents  of  phantom  traffic  solutions  seek 
to  resolve.  The  first  issue  involves  the  information  about  a  call  that  is  generated 
and  exchanged.  The  FCC’s  rules  already  address  this  concern,  but  they  need  to  be 
enforced.6 Vigorous FCC enforcement of its existing rules can go a long way toward 
solving the phantom traffic problem. It is also important to note that certain ILECs 
themselves  bear  part  of  the  blame  for  the  phantom  traffic  issue  where  they  have 
not updated their networks to accommodate Signaling System 7 (‘‘SS7’’) technology. 
But before such ILECs seek to impose burdensome new technical and regulatory re-
quirements  on  the  entire  VoIP  industry,  they  should  be  required  to  make  the  nec-
essary  upgrades  to  their  own  networks  to  be  able  to  handle  ‘‘necessary’’  signaling 
information  prior  to  suggesting  that  other  intermediate  carriers  assume  any  addi-
tional burdens. 

Current signaling requirements could potentially be fine-tuned to further address 
the situation to the extent such actions are technically, operationally, and economi-
cally  feasible  for  all,  to  the  extent  that  they  are  necessary  for  an  interim  solution 
to be effective, and in a manner that spreads the burden equitably between all enti-
ties  in  the  transmission  chain.  To  this  end,  the  VON  Coalition  could  support  a  re-
quirement that, where technically and operationally feasible with the network tech-
nology deployed at the time the call was originated, the originating providers trans-
mit the telephone number received from or assigned to the calling party. For PSTN 
connected  services,  all  providers  in  the  communications  stream  pass  currently  gen-
erated  call  identifying  information  without  modification.  This  requirement  would 
not apply where no telephone number is assigned to the calling party. Importantly, 
however,  the  VON  Coalition  does  not  support  any  new  obligations  to  generate  call 
identifying information where such information does not generate organically. 

The  second  issue  involves  the  compensation  structure  for  traffic  that  does  not 
meet  the  billing  requirements  of  legacy  terminating  phone  companies.  Proponents 
of  additional  regulatory  burdens  seek  to  impose  backward-looking  obligations  and 
high  access  rates  on  new  entrants  and  new  technologies  in  the  guise  of  ‘‘phantom 
traffic’’  solutions  for  two  underlying  reasons.  First,  the  current  compensation  struc-

5 The  Commission  has  taken  a  strong  view  against  piecemeal  decisions  that  might  ‘‘stymie 
comprehensive reform.’’ For example, in rejecting a recent forbearance petition, the Commission 
was  concerned  that  ‘‘such  relief  would  . . .  require  us  to  prejudge  important  issues  pending  in 
broader  rulemakings  and  otherwise  distort  the  Commission’s  deliberative  process.’’  Petition  of 
SBC Communications Inc. for Forbearance from the Application of Title II Common Carrier Reg-
ulation to IP Platform Services, Memorandum Opinion and Order, 20 FCC Rcd 9361 (2005). 

6 Specifically,  carriers  that  utilize  SS7  signaling  already  are  required  to  transmit  the  calling 
party  number  associated  with  an  interstate  call  to  interconnecting  carriers.  47  C.F.R. 
§ 64.1601(a). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

ture  does  not  reflect  current  technological  and  market  realities  and  disproportion-
ately benefits legacy terminating LECs. And second, some are seeking to remedy de-
ficiencies in their own networks and billing systems at the expense of others. Com-
prehensive intercarrier compensation reform is one of the fundamental policy issues 
currently being considered by the FCC. 

The  so-called  phantom  traffic  ‘‘solutions’’  not  only  won’t  solve  these  fundamental 
policy  challenges,  but  worse,  they  will  delay  the  reform  that  is  necessary  to  put  all 
carriers  on  a  level  playing  field.  A  rush  to  judgment  on  the  phantom  traffic  issue, 
without  proper  consideration  of  the  broader  interests  of  consumers  and  small  busi-
nesses  would  be  a  dramatic  departure  from  the  Federal  goals  on  compensation  re-
form which include encouraging network efficiency and investment, and the develop-
ment of efficient competition.7 
II.  Congress  Should  Proceed  Cautiously  to  Avoid  Negative  Unintended 

Consequences of New Phantom Traffic Regulation 

The  VON  Coalition  cannot  over-emphasize  the  need  to  proceed  cautiously.  There 
is  a  significant  danger  of  negative  unintended  consequences  of  going  too  far  to  fast 
here.  As  an  initial  matter,  we  are  concerned  that  proponents  of  one-off  phantom 
traffic  regulation  have  not  adequately  demonstrated  a  quantifiable  problem  that 
cannot  be  adequately  addressed  through  vigilant  enforcement  of  existing  rules.  In-
formation  regarding  the  true  size  and  scope  of  the  so-called  phantom  traffic  prob-
lem,  and  tending  to  show  that  it  is  a  significant  problem  that  cannot  be  addressed 
by  FCC  enforcement,  is  a  reasonable  and  necessary  precondition  for  any  additional 
regulatory requirements. There is also insufficient evidence that the long-term costs 
to  consumers,  service  providers,  and  our  economy  from  a  new  Internet  regulatory 
scheme  imposed  to  address  any  quantifiable  phantom  traffic  problem—are  out-
weighed  by  any  short  term  benefit  to  incumbents.  In  addition  to  this  fundamental 
cost-benefit analysis, the Committee should refrain from acting until the impacts of 
any such action on existing law (such as the Call Home Act), broadband deployment, 
and  the  Internet  generally,  are  understood.  There’s  no  need  to  conduct  open-heart 
surgery to fix a paper cut. 

IP networks and the gateways that enable the transition between broadband com-
munications and the PSTN are critical links for empowering consumers and driving 
economic  benefits  related  to  IP-enabled  communications.  That’s  why  it’s  critical  to 
consider the technical variations of networks and not try to retrofit new technologies 
into legacy network solutions. By avoiding rules that create new and onerous obliga-
tions  to  generate  call  identifying  information  where  such  information  does  not  gen-
erate organically, policymakers can help ensure continued investment in IP-enabled 
networks,  and  avoid  backward-looking  decisions  that  can  stifle  innovation,  impede 
technology investment, and slow the transition to broadband communications. 

Regardless  of  the  path  taken,  the  FCC  should  never  permit  terminating  carriers 
to resort to ‘‘self-help.’’ Some ILECs have suggested that both intermediate and ter-
minating  carriers  should  have  the  right  to  block  ‘‘improperly  labeled  traffic.’’  Be-
cause such action blatantly gives competitors the ability to discriminate and is cus-
tomer  affecting,  policymakers  should  never  tolerate  or  permit  blocking  of  any  IP 
traffic under any circumstances. 
III. Getting to the Right Intercarrier Compensation Regime 

Only a few years ago, five rural ILECs and U.S. Telecom wrote to this Committee 
arguing that the FCC should not take interim steps to clarify the correct compensa-
tion  regime  for  VoIP  because  ‘‘[t]hese  issues  should  be  addressed  comprehensively 
and  not  in  a  piecemeal  fashion,  as  the  FCC  has  previously  recognized.’’ 8 They  ar-
gued  that  to  ‘‘act  on  an  ad  hoc  basis  on  only  one  aspect  of  a  much  larger  problem 
at  this  stage  is  totally  unwarranted.’’  And  they  asked  for  help  in  preventing  the 
‘‘FCC from taking any hasty, ill-timed, and ill-conceived action.’’ 9 

The  VON  Coalition  likewise  agrees  that  acting  on  an  ad  hoc  basis  on  only  one 
aspect  of  a  much  larger  problem  at  this  stage  is  totally  unwarranted,  especially 
when the ad hoc solution being proposed by the ILECs is likely to impose high per- 
minute  access  charges  on  VoIP  providers.  Such  access  charges  would  overcompen-
sate  ILECs  because  they  do  not  remotely  reflect  the  true  costs  of  traffic  exchange, 
while at the same time stifling consumer benefits of IP-enabled communications and 

7 See Developing a Unified Intercarrier Compensation Regime, Notice of Proposed Rulemaking, 

16 FCC Rcd 9610, 9612 (2001). 

8 Eastern  Rural  Telecom  Association,  Independent  Telephone  and  Telecommunications  Alli-
ance, National Telecommunications Cooperative Association, Organization for the Promotion and 
Advancement  of  Small  Telecommunications  Companies,  United  States  Telecom  Association, 
Western Telecommunications Alliance Letter to Senator Daniel K. Inouye (Feb. 3, 2005). 

9 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

slowing  broadband  adoption  in  the  United  States.  Instead,  we  urge  the  Committee 
to  encourage  regulators  to  continue  to  focus  attention  on  completing  action  on  its 
omnibus intercarrier compensation reform proceeding. Such an approach avoids im-
posing  costly  but  temporary  ‘‘band-aid’’  requirements  on  broadband  communication, 
protects  VoIP  consumers  from  arbitrary  price  increases,  and  ensures  that  new  in-
vestment in IP-enabled networks, applications, and services is not unnecessarily de-
terred. 

The  current  regime  is,  in  a  word,  broken  and  the  apparent  catalyst  behind  the 
request  for  new  phantom  traffic  solutions  is  the  very  issue  that  should  be  driving 
the  FCC  to  adopt  comprehensive  compensation  reform:  rapid  technological  changes 
in  the  communications  industry  have  made  virtually  all  current  compensation  and 
billing mechanisms obsolete. Thus, to the extent this Committee acts, it should focus 
its initial efforts on quantifying the scope of the ‘‘phantom traffic’’ problem. The ex-
istence of a problem is a gating issue, and estimates as to the size and scope of the 
problem  vary  greatly.  Congress  should  focus  on  doing  no  harm  prior  to  mandating 
new  regulatory  constructs.  The  risks  associated  with  retrofitting  outdated  techno-
logical  and  compensation  regimes  onto  bold  new  communications  tools  vastly  out-
weigh the financial rewards these ILECs seek. 
IV. Conclusion 

VoIP technology has benefited people all across America from cities to suburbs to 
exurbs. And it has been especially important for consumers living in rural America 
who  are  just  now  beginning  to  enjoy  the  benefits  of  broadband  and  voice  competi-
tion. Enabling Internet-based voice communication can help consumers (particularly 
rural consumers) to benefit from voice competition, encourage rural telecom compa-
nies  to  extend  broadband  infrastructure  more  affordably,  allow  remote  businesses 
to transform the way they operate, and help rural communities to connect to a new 
world  of  remote  job  opportunities,  resulting  in  rural  economies  becoming  an  engine 
for higher paying information age jobs. 

However,  imposing  rules  meant  for  yesterday’s  phone  network  on  to  tomorrow’s 
digital age would adversely affect these vast consumer benefits. The VON Coalition 
in  no  way  endorses  fraudulent  removal  of  call  signaling  information.  Many  legacy 
telephone companies, however, would use this fear as a means to burdensomely reg-
ulate  the  balance  of  innocent  VoIP  actors.  We  urge  the  Committee  to  take  extreme 
caution in how it proceeds with this ‘‘phantom’’ problem. 

Thank you very much. I am happy to answer questions. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Our  last  witness  is  Mr.  Raymond  Henagan,  General  Manager  of 

Rock Port Telephone Company. Mr. Henagan? 

STATEMENT OF RAYMOND HENAGAN, GENERAL MANAGER, 

ROCK PORT TELEPHONE COMPANY; ON BEHALF OF THE 

NATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS COOPERATIVE 

ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  HENAGAN.  Good  afternoon,  Senators.  Thank  you  for  inviting 

me here today. 

Before I outline the problems, please understand that small rural 
carriers  get  about  29  percent  of  their  revenues  from  carrier  pay-
ments. Schemes to avoid these payments make it difficult to afford 
service to rural consumers. 

The first key problem is carriers are not sending all the detailed 
information  required  for  proper  billing.  Recent  analysis  of  our 
records  show  that  11  percent  of  the  calls  sent  for  termination  on 
Rock  Port’s  network  lack  of  calling  party’s  number.  Sherburne 
Telephone  Company  in  Minnesota  also  discovered  that  30  percent 
of their terminating calls arrive without valid CPN. 

Second,  Rock  Port  and  most  other  small  carriers  are  not  receiv-
ing  all  the  detailed  call  records  from  the  tandem  carrier  who  pro-
vides us with connections to the outside world. To give you an idea 
of  the  size  of  the  problem,  in  2007  we  saw  over  18  percent  of  our 
minutes being sent over Rock Port’s network were traveling for free 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

because  they  are  not  receiving  the  call  records  needed  to  bill  for 
these calls. 

Third,  many  rural  carriers  cannot  send  an  accurate  bill  out  to 
certain wireless carriers because we are not privy to the necessary 
traffic  information.  Wireless  carriers  insist  on  using  traffic  factors 
to bill access charges for nonlocal calls. However, this factor is not 
based on real traffic. Not surprising, these percentages range from 
0 to 3 percent. We need actual traffic information to be able to ne-
gotiate agreements with wireless carriers on an equal playing field. 
Fourth, rural carriers are receiving letters from carriers refusing 
to pay access bills claiming the FCC has given them permission to 
use  their  networks  for  free  because  they  are  IP.  Now,  you  and  I 
both  know  these  are  regular  voice  calls,  people  talking  to  people. 
Because  these  companies  have  sprinkled  IP  fairy  dust  on  them, 
they  think  they  get  a  free  ride.  IP  technology  has  never  been 
magic. Everyone has it. I have it. AT&T has it. IP is a technology. 
It is not a service. It is not a network. It is not the Internet. These 
are regular voice calls. 

Senators we need your action at the Federal level. Present policy 
is  failing  to  get  me  critical  billing  information  and  is  giving  these 
carriers  excuses  for  not  paying  for  calls  they  sent  to  our  network. 
Additionally,  the  FCC  is  not  allowing  us  to  block  the  non-pay  car-
riers,  and  this  is  like  an  unconstitutional  taking.  What  other  busi-
ness  is  required  to  give  away  its  product  or  services  free  due  to 
government action? 

NECA  has  filed  a  petition  asking  the  FCC  to  extend  its  call  sig-
naling  rules  to  all  voice  service  providers  who  use  the  PSTN  re-
gardless  of  the  technology  that  is  used.  NECA  has  asked  the  FCC 
to  allow  carriers  to  use  phone  numbers  as  a  default  proxy  for  bill-
ing purposes when wireless carriers do not provide real traffic data 
or when you cannot mutually agree upon a traffic factor. Granting 
NECA’s petition would be a good first step. 

We  also  need  the  FCC  to  confirm  all  users  of  the  network.  The 
network  must  pay  for  its  use.  FCC  has  stated  this  is  a  policy  and 
has implemented rules and has said voice services are the same as 
telephone  services  in  the  customer’s  eyes,  but  has  not  confirmed 
that  voice  calls  are  subject  to  its  access  rules  like  all  other  calls. 
If  FCC  lets  this  continue,  Americans  who  live  in  rural  areas  will 
likely see their phone bills escalate, their quality of services will be 
decreased,  a  large  reduction  in  investment  in  broadband,  and  an 
increase in Universal Service contributions. 

Senators  Missouri  is  the  ‘‘Show  Me  State.’’  So  I  am  asking  you 

to please show us some action on this critical issue. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Henagan follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RAYMOND HENAGAN,  GENERAL MANAGER,  ROCK PORT 
TELEPHONE COMPANY;  ON BEHALF OF THE NATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
COOPERATIVE ASSOCIATION 

Introduction 

Good  afternoon  Senators,  and  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  share  with  you 
today the serious financial problems that phantom or unbillable traffic is presenting 
for America’s small rural telecommunications carriers. For the past 10 years I have 
served as the General Manager of the Rock Port Telephone Company in Rock Port, 
Missouri,  and  my  professional  career  in  the  telecommunications  industry  spans 
more than 38 years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

In addition to Rock Port and the National Telecommunications Cooperative Asso-
ciation (NTCA), I am also appearing on behalf of the Organization for the Promotion 
and  Advancement  of  Small  Telecommunications  Companies  (OPASTCO),  and  the 
Western Telecommunications Alliance (WTA). 
Specific Company Dynamics 

Organized  as  a  cooperative,  Rock  Port’s  top  priority  has  always  been  to  provide 
every one of its consumers, who are also its owners, with the very best telecommuni-
cations and customer service possible. Rock Port serves 1,695 access lines across its 
187 square mile rural service area. This is about 9 lines per square mile. The popu-
lation throughout our service area is aging, and the average county wage is $21,373. 
We  employ  a  total  of  9  people—yes,  9—and  our  annual  revenue  is  $1.6  million.  By 
comparison,  Embarq,  which  is  a  Tier  2,  or  midsize,  carrier,  has  18,000  employees 
and  total  revenues  for  2007  of  $6.37  billion.1 Verizon,  which  is  a  Tier  1,  or  large 
carrier, has 235,000 employees and last year generated consolidated operating reve-
nues of $93.5 billion.2 

The  entrepreneurial  spirit  of  Rock  Port  is  representative  of  its  approximately 
1,100 small rural counterparts in the industry, who together serve 50 percent of the 
Nation’s  land  mass.  We  have  always  been  early  adopters  of  new  technologies,  and 
it’s  been  no  different  with  regard  to  Internet  Protocol  (IP)  capabilities.  Presently, 
Rock Port makes high-speed broadband available to 90 percent of its customers and 
we  expect  that  figure  to  be  100  percent  within  3  months.  Due  to  this  commitment, 
rural Americans today are enjoying universal telephone service, access to broadband 
Internet services, and enhanced emergency preparedness. 

Yet,  small  rural  companies  simply  do  not  enjoy  the  economies  of  scale  and  scope 
that would permit them to interconnect with every service provider in America who 
might  send  a  call  to  one  of  their  customers.  Most  small  rural  carriers,  including 
Rock  Port,  interconnect  with  a  larger  carrier,  such  as  Embarq  or  Verizon,  who  in 
turn provides them with access to all other telecom service providers. We call these 
intermediary carriers ‘‘tandem providers.’’ 
Rural Telecom Network Cost Recovery 

Due to the extremely high costs associated with serving rural markets, small car-
riers like Rock Port depend on three primary sources of revenue to provide the cost 
recovery that is necessary to provide advanced, high quality services to rural Ameri-
cans.  They  are:  (1)  intercarrier  compensation  payments  from  other  carriers,  (2)  di-
rect payments from our own customers, and (3) support from the Federal Universal 
Service  Fund  (USF).  Using  the  analogy  of  a  three  legged  stool,  if  any  one  of  these 
three legs are missing or shortened, the stool is thrown off balance and the company 
mission is toppled. 

Intercarrier  compensation  payments  are  made  by  one  carrier  to  another  for  the 
use of its network, for example when one of Carrier A’s customers calls one of Car-
rier B’s customers. Intercarrier compensation takes the form of either interstate ac-
cess charges, intrastate access charges, or reciprocal compensation charges. 

The  term  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’  refers  to  voice  communications  traffic  on  the  public 
network  that  lacks  sufficient  information  for  billing  purposes.  In  other  words,  car-
riers  do  not  receive  the  information  necessary  to  know  who  to  bill  or  what  rate  to 
bill for the call—thus under today’s policy the call remains unbilled. In some cases, 
because  rural  carriers  do  not  receive  the  billing  information,  they  cannot  identify 
the  traffic  traversing  their  networks—thus  the  term  ‘‘phantom.’’  Increasingly,  rural 
carriers  are  discovering  blatant  schemes  intended  to  avoid  the  payment  of  access 
charges entirely. This translates into dramatic losses of legitimate cost recovery rev-
enue  for  telecommunications  carriers  of  all  sizes,  while  the  carriers  are  still  obli-
gated to provide and maintain the facilities. 

NECA has estimated that small rural carriers across the Nation typically receive 
about 29 percent of their total net telephone company operating revenue from inter-
carrier  payments.  For  some  companies,  this  percentage  is  as  high  as  49  percent  of 
total  net  operating  revenue.  So,  you  can  see  how  important  these  intercarrier  pay-
ments  are  for  providing  affordable  service  to  rural  consumers.  You  can  see  why  we 
view  the  growth  of  phantom  traffic  and  other  schemes  to  avoid  paying  intercarrier 
fees with such concern. And you can see why this is a topic critical enough for this 
Committee and Federal policymakers in general to address. 

1 See, http://investors.embarq.com/phoenix.zhtml?c=197829&p=irol-irhome. 
2 See http://investor.verizon.com/. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Identification of Phantom Traffic 

19 

Recognizing or identifying phantom, or unbillable, traffic is not always automatic 
or  easy.  The  inherent  dilemma  with  phantom  traffic  is  that,  by  its  very  definition, 
it  is  essentially  hidden  and  thus  extremely  difficult  to  identify  or  track.  And  by  ex-
tension, it is very difficult to quantify its overall negative impact. 

In  its  most  insidious  form,  phantom  traffic  is  a  result  of  some  carriers  stripping 
the data completely, manipulating the data into an unreadable form, or the outright 
refusal  to  pay  the  intercarrier  bill  for  the  calls  they  send  to  another  carrier’s  net-
work. In other cases, phantom traffic materializes as a result of an originating serv-
ice  provider’s  failure  to  attach  appropriate  call  signaling  information  to  its  traffic. 
And in its most subtle form, phantom traffic is merely the outcome of flawed policies 
that  allow  for  false  jurisdictional  classification  of  calls,  which  results  in  the  erro-
neous  billing  of  lower  charges.  All  forms  distort  marketplace  competition  and  force 
carriers  inappropriately  to  seek  cost  recovery  through  other  means.  For  rural  car-
riers this means higher access charges for those who do pay and increased reliance 
on the Universal Service Fund. 

At Rock Port, the unbillable or phantom traffic traversing our network is substan-
tial—over  18  percent  of  total  minutes.  Unfortunately,  Rock  Port  is  not  alone.  They 
say  misery  loves  company,  and  we  seem  to  have  plenty  of  it.  Industry  estimates 
show between 20 percent and 30 percent of such intercarrier traffic cannot be billed 
because it lacks sufficient billing information.3 This figure is growing as service pro-
viders find new ways to avoid paying intercarrier compensation. 

In  2007  alone,  Rock  Port  lost  access  revenue  equal  to  about  $37  per  access  line 
per year—because we did not have enough information to bill for the calls. Over the 
course of 8 years, say from 2000 to 2008, this would amount to about a half million 
dollars.  While  this  may  seem  like  peanuts  up  here  in  Washington  D.C.,  where  I 
come  from  it  translates  into  meat  and  potatoes.  I  would  not  like  to  have  to  tell  my 
customers  that  their  phone  bills  have  to  go  up  to  pay  for  someone  else’s  free  ride 
on  the  network  we  are  obligated  to  build,  maintain  and  support.  Unlike  the  indus-
try’s  larger  carriers,  we  small  rural  carriers  do  not  have  the  scale,  market  alter-
natives,  or  customer  numbers  to  make  up  the  revenue  elsewhere—nor  should  we 
have  to.  And  if  we  do  not  meet  our  financial  targets,  our  sources  of  financing  for 
introducing  new  technology  and  modern,  advanced  communications  services  dry  up 
PDQ—pretty darn quick. 
Key Phantom Traffic Problems 

One  of  the  key  causes  of  phantom  traffic  is  the  failure  of  certain  carriers  to  send 
all  of  the  call  signaling  information  (intentionally  or  unintentionally)  required  for 
proper  billing.  The  FCC  does  have  a  rule  requiring  carriers  sending  an  interstate 
call  to  transmit  the  Calling  Party’s  Number  (CPN).  This  information  helps  carriers 
establish what rate to bill and can help identify what service provider sent the call. 
This  information  is  also  required  in  order  for  law  enforcement  officers  to  trace  the 
call, for emergency workers to track the calling party, and to provide Caller ID serv-
ices. Yet, if the number is altered or stripped off entirely, as it often is, these statu-
tory and regulatory objectives are easily frustrated. 

A  case  in  point  involves  the  Alaska  Communications  Systems  Group  which  in 
2005 sent a letter to the FCC describing traffic being terminated in Alaska as ‘‘local’’ 
traffic, but which in fact originated from out-of-state phones.4 In this case, the inter-
mediary  carrier  had  replaced  the  telephone  number  of  the  originating  caller  with 
a  local  Alaska  number  in  order  to  disguise  the  jurisdiction  of  the  call  and  thereby 
avoid  paying  the  access  charge.  ACS  indicated  that  in  the  month  of  October  2005 
alone, over 20 percent of minutes to Fairbanks had this problem. 

Recent  analysis  shows  about  11  percent  of  calls  other  carriers  sent  Rock  Port  for 
termination on our network lacked a CPN. Another Kansas company received about 
11.7 percent of calls without CPN. Sherburne Telephone in Minnesota recently per-
formed  a  similar  analysis  only  to  discover,  to  their  surprise,  that  about  30  percent 
of their terminating traffic arrives without a valid CPN. 

A  second  key  problem  faced  by  Rock  Port  and  most  other  small  rural  carriers  is 
we don’t receive all the detailed call records from the intermediate ‘‘tandem’’ carrier 
who provides us with connection to the outside world. If we don’t receive this infor-
mation, we cannot bill for the traffic. 

3 E.g.,Letter  from  Donna  Epps,  Verizon,  to  Marlene  H.  Dortch,  FCC,  CC  Docket  No.  01–92 
(Nov.  1,  2006),  attachment,  at  11.  Letter  from  Karen  Brinkmann,  Latham  &  Watkins,  to  Mar-
lene  H.  Dortch,  FCC,  CC  Docket  No.  01–92  (July  1,  2005),  attaching  presentation  entitled 
‘‘Phantom Traffic: Problem and Solutions’’, Balhoff & Rowe (May 2005), at 5. 

4 Letter  from  Karen  Brinkmann,  Latham  &  Watkins,  LLP,  to  Marlene  H.  Dortch,  FCC,  CC 

Docket No. 01–92 (Dec. 12, 2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

In  2000,  we  at  Rock  Port  discovered  that  we  were  not  receiving  call  records  for 
about  25  percent  of  the  minutes  traveling  over  our  network.  Because  we  could  not 
bill  for  them  without  these  records,  they  were  traveling  for  free.  Armed  with  this 
information,  we  negotiated  with  the  tandem  provider  to  alter  how  its  network 
switches  were  configured  so  that  they  could  send  us  complete  records.  We  thought 
the  problem  was  essentially  solved.  In  2007,  however,  we  did  a  comparison  of  the 
minutes  our  own  switches  recorded  with  the  number  of  minutes  contained  in  the 
bill records we receive from the tandem provider. We had recorded 10.5 million min-
utes, but received call records for only 8.6 million minutes. That left 1.9 million min-
utes  that  we  could  not  bill  for.  The  percent  of  phantom  traffic  on  our  network  had 
climbed from 14.5 percent in 2006 to 18.2 percent in 2007. There is no logical tech-
nical  reason  why  we  should  not  be  receiving  accurate  call  records  from  the  tandem 
provider that tracks our network’s actual traffic volume. 

And  it  is  certainly  not  just  Rock  Port.  Our  industry  colleagues  in  Montana  had 
a problem big enough to convince state lawmakers to address the issue of phantom 
traffic  by  adopting  a  state  law  in  2003  that  required  carriers  to  send  call  signaling 
information  and  required  tandem  transit  providers  such  as  Qwest  to  provide  com-
plete  call  records.  The  rural  carriers  use  this  data  to  crosscheck  their  own  network 
data,  which  has  helped  reduce  phantom  traffic  loss  levels  from  10  percent  to  less 
than  5  percent  of  their  volume.  A  similar  initiative  was  enacted  in  South  Dakota 
in  2004,  though  it  was  recently  overturned  on  procedural  grounds  tied  to  preemp-
tion.  Likewise,  industry  colleagues  in  Washington  and  Oregon  took  their  phantom 
traffic  case  to  their  state  PUCs,  providing  data  showing  as  much  as  50  percent  of 
the  traffic  on  their  local  interconnection  trunks  was  ‘‘phantom.’’  In  2005,  however, 
these  PUCs  decided  that  it  was  more  appropriate  to  bring  these  issues  to  the  FCC 
for  consideration.  Clearly  with  this  level  of  state  activity,  it  is  obvious  this  is  an 
issue that is crying out for Federal action. 

Some industry players argue that when we don’t receive call signaling or records, 
we can still bill based on ‘‘traffic factors’’. These are percentages given to us by the 
sending  carriers  that  are  to  be  used  for  assigning  traffic  into  the  interstate,  intra-
state  or  local  categories—by  which  we  then  assign  rates.  The  sending  carriers  pro-
vide  absolutely  no  supporting  data  to  back  up  these  unilateral  traffic  factors,  and 
studies  have  shown  that  the  factors  do  not  represent  the  actual  traffic  patterns  on 
the  network.  Therefore,  the  third  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’  problem  is  that  we  have  no 
means to verify the accuracy of these traffic factors. These carriers will only accept 
and pay a bill reflecting these factors. 

This  is  particularly  critical  for  traffic  from  wireless  carriers.  Rural  companies  in 
South  Dakota  ran  a  study  to  compare  the  non-local  wireless  traffic  factor  (for  calls 
that  cross  a  wireless  Major  Trading  Area,  i.e.,  inter-MTA  calls)  given  to  them  by 
one  wireless  carrier  with  the  actual  percent  of  non-local  wireless  (inter-MTA)  calls 
on  their  networks.  They  found  that  as  much  as  30  percent  of  total  wireless  traffic 
terminating  on  their  network  was  inter-MTA,  compared  to  the  3  percent  interMTA 
factor given to them by this wireless carrier. And many of their wireless agreements 
have  a  0  percent  inter-MTA  factor.  These  South  Dakota  companies  are,  therefore, 
not  able  to  bill  the  correct  rate  for  the  25–30  percent  of  wireless  traffic  that  is  le-
gally  subject  to  access  charges.  In  2004,  the  amount  of  access  revenue  lost  due  to 
these  unrealistic  factors  represented  an  astonishing  $12  to  $39  per  access  line  per 
year.  In  light  of  this  demonstrated  lack  of  ‘‘good  faith’’,  it  is  clear  that  small  rural 
carriers  need  the  FCC  to  provide  them  with  additional  negotiating  leverage  to  be 
able  to  negotiate  inter-MTA  traffic  factors  that  are  realistic  and  reflect  the  actual 
usage on the network. 

The  final  dilemma  associated  with  phantom  traffic  that  I  will  discuss  today  in-
volves  the  outright  refusal  of  so-called  VoIP  providers  to  pay  their  access  charge 
bills. Rural carriers across the Nation are receiving an increasing number of letters 
from  interconnected  carriers  refusing  to  pay  access  charge  bills,  claiming  the  calls 
were  ‘‘IP.’’  Laurel  Highlands  Tel  (PA)  has  provided  the  FCC  evidence  that  carriers 
such  as  ChoiceOne  are  not  only  refusing  payment  of  access  charges,  but  may  also 
be  enticing  other  carriers  to  migrate  their  traffic  to  its  ‘‘free’’  network.  Montana 
Telecom  Association  provided  the  FCC  with  similar  letters  from  CommPartners, 
which  admitted  that  90–100  percent  of  its  terminating  traffic  to  various  Montana 
ILECs is interexchange, but stated that ‘‘because this traffic represents VoIP trans-
missions  rather  than  circuit-switched  telephone  calls,  your  company  is  not  entitled 
to collect access charges on these calls.’’ NECA has also provided a number of such 
letters to the FCC. 

At  the  end  of  the  day,  you  and  I  both  know  these  are  nothing  more  than  voice 
calls—people  talking  to  people.  But  because  these  companies  have  sprinkled  ‘‘IP 
fairy dust’’ on them, they think they should get a free ride on our network. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

IP technology has never been magic—controlled by a few magicians in their Inter-
net labs. I have IP technology in my network, AT&T has it and Verizon has it. Pub-
lic  telephone  networks  around  the  world  are  introducing  IP  technology  into  their 
networks.  IP  is  a  technology—it  is  not  a  service,  it  is  not  a  network,  and  it  is  not 
the same as the Internet. IP is today’s iteration of communications technology—not 
tomorrow’s  iteration—and  once  again,  however  delivered  these  calls  are  just  voice 
calls. 

But  because  the  FCC  has  not  yet  confirmed  that  access  charges  apply  to  inter-
connected  VoIP  service,  these  CLECs  are  claiming  their  services  are  ‘‘enhanced’’ 
and,  therefore,  exempt  from  access  charges.  Because  the  FCC  has  remained  silent, 
more  and  more  rural  phone  companies  are  receiving  letters  from  service  providers 
who  refuse  to  pay  the  intercarrier  bills  for  calls  they  agree  they  sent  to  rural 
telecom  company  networks.  And  current  Federal  policy  requires  us  to  continue  giv-
ing our product away to companies who refuse to pay for it, even when we do send 
them a bill. 

Please  tell  me  why  we  allow  other  utilities  to  stop  service  when  we  are  late  in 
payment, why I could not check into my hotel until my credit card company agreed 
to make payment, and we let banks foreclose on homeowners and take their homes 
from  them  when  they  don’t  pay  their  mortgages,  but  we  do  not  take  service  away 
from these ‘‘high tech’’ companies who won’t pay their bills? 
Turning Point 

So, the big question is—what can be done about phantom traffic? 
First,  the  FCC  needs  to  require  all  service  providers  to  send  all  the  telephone 
numbers  and  other  traffic  identifiers—just  like  is  required  for  an  ATM  cash  trans-
action  to  take  place.  NECA  has  filed  a  petition  for  an  interim  order  with  the  FCC 
asking it to: (a) Extend their existing call signaling rules to all interconnected voice 
service  providers;  (b)  Require  accurate  CPNs  be  transmitted  with  all  calls,  regard-
less  of  jurisdiction  and  regardless  of  technology  used;  (c)  Clarify  that  the  true  CPN 
must  be  provided,  not  a  number  associated  with  intermediate  switches,  gateways, 
or platforms; (d) Require all intermediate service providers to transmit signaling in-
formation unaltered; and (e) Clarify that the originating and terminating telephone 
numbers can be used as a default proxy to determine jurisdiction of calls for billing 
purposes, when traffic factors cannot be mutually agreed or data on the actual origi-
nation  or  termination  point  is  not  provided.  Almost  every  segment  of  the  telecom 
industry  in  America  has  expressed  support  for  strengthened  call  signaling  rules. 
Yet, we are still awaiting some action on this front. 

Second, I need to be able to bill for all the calls on my network. I need to receive 
call  records  for  all  the  calls,  and  when  I  don’t,  I  need  the  tools  to  hold  the  person 
who sent those calls to me accountable. The Montana state law may provide a good 
model  for  Federal  action.  It  requires  the  tandem  transit  providers  to  provide  call 
records to the terminating carriers. However, when I don’t receive those call records, 
I  need  to  be  able  to  charge  the  guy  at  the  other  end  of  the  trunk  who  is  sending 
me  those  calls  without  the  records.  Just  like  in  the  children’s  game  of  telephone, 
I  can  only  see  the  person  next  to  me  who  is  passing  me  the  message.  I  cannot  see 
the person originating the message. The guy at the other end of the trunk can then 
pass  the  charges  down  to  the  next  guy  who  is  sending  him  the  traffic,  and  so  on 
down  the  food  chain.  I  cannot  hold  some  unknown,  unnamed  service  provider  ac-
countable without such tools. 

Third, we need a federally-approved tool that will provide small carriers with the 
ability  to  negotiate  realistic  traffic  factors  for  non-local,  inter-MTA  wireless  calls 
with  wireless  carriers.  The  NECA  petition  has  proposed  the  use  of  the  ‘‘telephone 
numbers  rule’’  as  a  reasonable  proxy  for  when  actual  traffic  data  is  not  provided 
or a traffic factor cannot be mutually agreed. A 2004 South Dakota study has dem-
onstrated that using call records and using telephone numbers produces fairly close 
results. We believe the telephone numbers rule is a reasonable proxy, and will give 
wireless carriers a strong incentive to bring real traffic data with them to the nego-
tiating table. 

And  finally,  we  need  the  FCC  to  affirm  that  all  users  of  the  network  must  pay 
for  its  use.  The  FCC  has  stated  that  this  is  the  policy,  has  implemented  rules,  has 
said  that  VoIP  services  are  the  same  as  telephone  services  in  the  customer’s  eyes. 
But  the  FCC  has  not  yet  confirmed  that  VoIP  calls  are  subject  to  its  access  charge 
rules  just  like  all  other  voice  calls.  This  has  allowed  service  providers  to  sprinkle 
the  ‘‘IP  fairy  dust’’  over  their  refusals  to  pay  their  access  bills  and  to  claim  they 
should  be  treated  different—that  they  are  Internet  Service  Providers—rather  than 
what they really are, which is providers of voice calls used by people to talk to other 
people. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

If  the  FCC  lets  this  continue,  Americans  who  live  in  rural  areas  will  likely  see 
their  phone  bills  increase  and  the  quality  of  their  services  decrease.  IP-originated 
voice  services  are  expected  to  account  for  more  than  20  percent  of  all  voice  calls  in 
2008,  33  percent  in  2010,  and  40  percent  in  2011.  We  simply  cannot  afford  to  give 
the use of our networks away for free. The Coalition of Telecom Manufacturers has 
said that if this continues, it will result in large reductions in telecom infrastructure 
investment, particularly investment in broadband access technologies. I can tell you, 
Senators,  this  will  certainly  be  true  in  rural  America,  and  will  jeopardize  the  na-
tional objective of ubiquitous broadband Internet access. 
Conclusion 

Senators,  time  is  of  the  essence.  With  each  passing  day,  small  rural  carriers  lose 
millions  in  intercarrier  compensation  revenue.  We  are  not  asking  for  special  treat-
ment.  We  are  only  asking  for  carriers  that  use  our  network  to  pay  for  its  use.  It 
is  anti-competitive  to  allow  some  carriers  to  avoid  these  fees  while  others  pay,  and 
it is affecting the ability of small rural carriers to roll out new technology and serv-
ices to rural America. 

Americans today uniformly rely on communications infrastructure and services to 
satisfy  their  commerce,  safety,  security,  entertainment,  and  leisure  needs.  Moving 
forward,  these  needs  will  be  met  via  a  combination  of  2-way  voice,  video,  and  data 
options.  Ensuring  that  small  rural  companies  have  the  financial  wherewithal  to 
meet these needs is the primary reason to take action to exterminate phantom traf-
fic.  Lack  of  action  on  phantom  traffic  is  putting  in  jeopardy  rural  carrier’s  ability 
to  help  us  achieve  our  shared  national  objective—ubiquitous  and  robust  broadband 
capable infrastructure. 

Senator Stevens has been hard at work drafting a legislative proposal that would 
go  a  long  way  toward  helping  resolve  the  phantom  traffic  issue  by  providing  the 
FCC  with  specific  guidance  on  actions  it  could  take  to  ensure  this  practice  is 
stopped.  Please  support  Senator  Stevens  in  his  efforts  to  address  phantom  traffic 
through  this  legislation.  And  please  urge  the  FCC  to  take  immediate  action  by 
granting  NECA’s  Petition.  You  know—Missouri  is  the  ‘‘Show  me’’  state,  and  we’d 
sure  be  pleased  if  you  could  show  support  for  our  concerns  on  this  crucial  matter. 
Thank you. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, thank you very much. 
Mr. Chairman, do you have any questions? 
The CHAIRMAN. I wish to say for the record that Senator McCas-
kill  of  Missouri  has  asked  me  to  express  her  regret  in  not  being 
able to attend this afternoon’s hearing because at this moment she 
is presiding in the Senate chamber. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
I am perplexed. Ms. Simpson, I would probably come to you first 
because you indicate that you think the FCC is right in not impos-
ing  any  requirement  on  the  originating  carrier  to  properly  disclose 
the type of information that would allow billing by the final termi-
nating  carrier.  The  rural  telephone  companies  are  primarily  those 
who  receive  these  calls  and  must  deliver  them.  I  take  it  you  take 
the  position  that  they  have  no  right  to  just  turn  around  and  send 
it back. 

Ms. SIMPSON. Well—— 
Senator STEVENS. Why not? Why do we not just say to the rural 
carriers,  if  you  get  something  that  does  not  have  identification  of 
where it came from, send it back to whoever gave it to you? 

Ms. SIMPSON.—well, the lack of information about where it came 
from  does  not  prevent  it  from  being  terminated  onto  the  network. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  it  does  because  what  you  do,  as  Mr. 
Henagan  says,  you  force  the  terminating  carriers  to  pay  the  cost 
of delivery when they have no way of billing anybody. 

Ms. SIMPSON. Senator Stevens, I would disagree with that state-

ment. 

Senator STEVENS. Will you tell me how they can bill? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Ms. SIMPSON. Well, VoIP providers do pay for the termination of 
traffic.  Many  VoIP  carriers  have  agreements  with  incumbents  for 
the termination of traffic. So—— 

Senator STEVENS. They do not apparently have it with rural car-
riers. They have it with the big city carriers. We are talking about 
the tentacles of this communication system. You go out to the end. 
You  are  dealing  with  rural  areas  like  our  area  or  like  the  islands 
in Hawaii. They are going to receive these without any information 
of who to bill. 

Ms.  SIMPSON.—well,  yes,  sir.  I  mean,  there  are  instances  where 
VoIP  providers  try  to  reach  agreements  with  rural  carriers  and 
rural carriers either refuse to enter into agreements or—— 

Senator STEVENS. You know why, do you not? The legacy carriers 
have  more  investment,  and  the  other  carriers  that  come  in  on 
broadband and Voice over the Internet Protocol have very little in-
vestment  in  their  communications  system.  Do  you  disagree  with 
that, Mr. Sarjeant? 

Mr.  SARJEANT.  The  rural  incumbent  carriers  have  made  a  lot  of 
investments  to  put  in  place  the  public  switched  network  which  is 
really  the  core  on  which  all  other  networks  to  some  extent  rely, 
whether they be wireless or IP-based. So clearly, there is a tremen-
dous amount of investment that has been made by incumbent local 
exchange carriers in the public switched telephone network. 

Ms. SIMPSON. Senator Stevens—— 
Senator  STEVENS.  Pardon  me.  My  mind  goes  back  to  the  time 
when Senator Inouye and I used to sit here at this same table and 
talk  about  the  fact  that  all  of  the  telephone  ads  and  the  television 
said these rates do not apply in Alaska and Hawaii. We introduced 
a  resolution  that  called  for  rate  integration,  and  that  rate  integra-
tion  required  that  Alaska  and  Hawaii  become  part  of  the  Union. 
We  were  already  a  state,  but  we  were  not  in  the  union  of  commu-
nications. 

That gradually led to what we called rate integration task forces, 
and they finally figured out how to do that. You know what it was. 
It  was  the  interstate  rate  pool  that  paid  for  the  termination  of 
these  calls  and  allowed  us  to  come  into  the  total  communications 
system,  but  because  the  cost  of  getting  to  our  states  was  greater 
than  any  other  states—at  that  time,  there  were  basically  legacy 
carriers. They were basically terrestrial. And we finally came in. 

Now, what you are saying, Ms. Simpson, is those areas like ours, 
which are still operating basically on the systems that in many in-
stances  you  all  got  rid  of  20  years  ago,  should  incur  the  costs  of 
modernization to catch up with VoIP, notwithstanding the fact that 
you  are  asking  them  to  terminate  calls  that  came  from  VoIP  with 
no  compensation.  As  Mr.  Henagan  says,  how  can  they  do  that  un-
less  they  get  some  compensation  which  will  justify  the  investment 
in the modernization you require? 

Ms.  SIMPSON.  Senator  Stevens,  I  would  not  suggest  at  all  that 
the  VON  Coalition  believes  that  rural  carriers  should  not  be  com-
pensated for the cost of terminating other folks’ traffic. 

And  I  would  also  just  note  that  the  interconnected  VoIP  pro-
viders  pay  into  the  Universal  Service  Fund  at  rates  higher  than 
traditional wireline carriers or wireless carriers. So, indeed, we are 
helping rural carriers invest in their networks. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

What  the  issue  comes  down  to  is  not  necessarily  the  rates  that 
would compensate them for the cost of terminating traffic. What we 
are talking about here is sort of the broader issue that the FCC is 
currently  investigating,  which  is  bringing  the  whole  intercarrier 
compensation regime to a more modern and equalized type of a sys-
tem. 

Senator STEVENS. I do not want to pick on you. 
Mr. McKee, you said something that also made me write it down 
as you were talking. Where does the ultimate carrier get its income 
to  really  affect  the  delivery  unless  there  is  some  identification  on 
the  message  that  allows  them,  in  effect,  to  back-charge  and  collect 
and get part of the cost of originating that call? 

Mr.  MCKEE.  Senator,  we  do  not  disagree  that  all  calls  should  be 

identified and that the signaling record should be populated. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  what  should  we  do  with  the  people  that 
do  not  do  it?  You  pick  up  VoIP  and  send  it  through  your  systems 
and through your switch, but you do not require the identification. 
You  know  when  it  is  coming  through  the  switch  it  does  not  have 
the information, and yet you send it on. 

Mr.  MCKEE.  Well  actually,  Senator,  Sprint—I  will  not  try  to 
speak for other telephone companies, but Sprint, when it originates 
VoIP  traffic,  it  does  populate  CPN  when  it  passes  it  out  to  the 
PSTN. 

Now, the lack of information on the other end can be for different 
reasons,  not  because  Sprint  did  not  populate  the  signaling  record 
at the beginning of the transmission of the call—— 

Senator STEVENS. Are you suggesting someone erases it? 
Mr. MCKEE.—well, not that they erase it, but—— 
Senator  STEVENS.  That  has  been  one  of  the  suggestions  one  of 
my  carriers  made,  that  there  is  someone  in  this  business  who  is 
automatically  erasing  the  system  so  that  no  one  can  be  properly 
billed. 

Mr.  MCKEE.—well,  again,  we  have  not  seen  evidence  that  there 
is  a  significant  amount  of  traffic  where  people  are  erasing  it.  The 
nature of a way in which, for example, tandems operate frequently 
do  not  pass  along  information,  or  if  two  tandems  are  involved  in 
the  call,  it  is  not  unusual  for  some  of  that  call  information  to  be 
stripped. That is why that type—— 
Senator STEVENS. Who strips it? 
Mr. MCKEE.—well, again, it is not as if it has been intentionally 
removed.  It  is  just  not  information  that  continues  to  flow  with  the 
call because it is broken when it passes through that switch. 

And  the  way  in  which  traditionally  we  have  handled  that  issue 
is through billing records so that tandem owner will collect the nec-
essary  information.  It  may  not  flow  in  the  signaling  protocol.  It 
may  not  be  part  of  an  automated  system,  but  instead  billing 
records are passed after the fact. So that is one way in which that 
issue gets addressed. 

So,  again,  part  of  my  testimony  was  there  are  many  different 
ways  to  exchange  information  that  allows  these  carriers  to  bill. 
Again,  Sprint  in  no  way  objects  to  carriers  billing  for  the  traffic 
they receive. 

In  fact,  one  of  the  issues  that  wireless  carriers  have  is  that  we 
also  cannot  bill  for  a  large  portion  of  the  traffic  we  receive.  It  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

not  because  we  do  not  get  sufficient  information,  but  because  the 
FCC  has  set  rules  up  in  such  a  way  that  inter-exchange  carriers, 
for example, are permitted to terminate traffic on the wireless net-
works without compensating us. 

It  is  a  part  of,  again,  what  I  characterize  as  an  irrational  inter-
carrier compensation structure, and we are hopeful that all of these 
issues get addressed by the FCC since they have had a docket out-
standing since 2001. 

Senator STEVENS. I tell you, you sort of indicate that the bill that 

I am about ready to introduce is meaningless. 

Mr.  MCKEE.  No.  I  am  not  suggesting  that  it  is  meaningless,  sir. 
Again,  our  concern  here  is  that  much  of  the  dispute  in  this  area 
is, again, not because of intentional fraudulent acts, but because of 
either inherent structural problems within the network that do not 
allow signaling to occur not because—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  if  I  initiate  a  call  over  VoIP,  I  should 
have  within  my  system—the  carrier  that  I  contact  with  my  Inter-
net  call—something  that  identifies  where  the  call  originated. 
Would you not agree with that? 

Mr.  MCKEE.—we  would  agree  that  the  CPN,  the  standard  fields 

that are provided for—— 

Senator STEVENS. That is the first carrier that my VoIP message 
intersects.  Right?  They  would  put  the  identification  on  where  it 
came from, would they not? 

Mr. MCKEE. Generally, yes. That or else they would have to con-

tract with somebody to do that. In other words, when—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  You  are  not  suggesting  that  just  because  I 
originated  on  VoIP,  I  am  automatically  originating  phantom  calls. 
None of us believe that. 

Mr. MCKEE.—no, no, of course, not. 
Senator  STEVENS.  So  the  first  carrier  that  really  received  that 
message ought to have some identification on it, do you not think? 
I  think  that  is  their  responsibility  to  see  that  is  done,  and  if  it  is 
done,  then  the  terminating  carrier  is  going  to  get  paid.  And  the 
problem is how to figure it out because a lot of the carriers are like 
Mr.  Henagan’s  carrier  and  those  in  our  States  which  are  still  leg-
acy carriers. They are using lines and using a lot of ground equip-
ment  that  you  all  are  not  going  to  be  using  any  longer.  But  they 
have  to  be  compensated  for  it  or  they  are  going  to  go  out  of  busi-
ness.  Thirty  percent  of  their  business  is  coming  in  through  VoIP 
now and not getting compensated. Now, how can they survive? 

Mr.  MCKEE.  Well,  again,  Senator,  we  are  not  disagreeing  that 
calling  party  number  information  should  be  part  of  the  populated 
record. Not at all. 

Senator  STEVENS.  But  VoIP  users  are  almost  being  told  that  it 
is  cheaper  to  do  that,  and  the  only  reason  it  is  cheaper  is  no  one 
is  sending  the  information  along  with  the  message  so  that  they 
have to pay when it finally is terminated. Would you not agree? 

Mr. MCKEE. I agree that there are certainly carriers that are of-
fering discounted services. The services that Sprint provides we are 
careful  to  ensure  that  we  are  compensating  the  carriers  we  hand 
that traffic off to. Now, if that means that we are at a competitive 
disadvantage, that may be the case, but I cannot speculate on what 
other carriers are doing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Henagan,  my  people  tell  me  that  the  lack 
of this compensation for this phantom traffic is putting them in the 
position where they cannot afford to go to broadband. Do you think 
this is a burden on these legacy carriers to carry this phantom traf-
fic and puts them in a position where they cannot modernize? 

Mr. HENAGAN. That is correct, Senator. To the future, we are not 
going  to  be  able  to  modernize  to  go  to  broadband  if  this  continues 
on  at  the  pace  that  it  is  going.  In  2006,  overall  all  the  phantom 
traffic  that  came  through  was  14.5  percent.  In  2007,  it  jumped  up 
to  over  18  percent.  If  this  continues  on,  it  will  not  be  long  until  it 
will  be  over  50  percent  of  the  traffic  that  is  coming  through,  and 
I  will  not  have  the  funds  at  that  time  to  continue  on  with 
broadband expansion. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Sarjeant,  does  the  FCC  have  a  sufficient 
record  of  phantom  traffic  to  move  forward  and  find  a  solution  now 
in your opinion? 

Mr.  SARJEANT.  Yes,  Qwest  believes  that  it  does  and  Qwest  be-
lieves that it could act forthwith and address at least on an interim 
basis  and  begin  to  mitigate  the  damages  associated  with  phantom 
traffic in very short order. So we believe they have a record. As Mr. 
McKee  pointed  out,  the  intercarrier  compensation  proceeding  was 
opened  in  2001.  So  it  is  a  longstanding  programming,  and  the 
issues of phantom traffic have been debated for some period of time 
now. 

Senator STEVENS. Mr. McKee, is this going to require that we tell 
the  FCC  they  must  adopt  new,  different  switching  technologies  in 
order to solve this problem? 

Mr. MCKEE. I hope that is not the case, Senator. Obviously, that 

would create significant expense within the industry. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  hope  you  will  repeat  that  because  everyone 
seems  to  think  that  the  burden  should  remain  on  the  poorer  car-
riers  at  the  end  and  the  ones  in  the  middle  that  are  capable  al-
ready  are  making  these  magnificent,  monstrous  investments.  If 
there is a change, it will place an additional burden on them. 

Now, why should they not help us find a solution? 
Mr. MCKEE. I think we are more than happy to try and help you 

find a solution, Senator. 

Senator STEVENS. I hope you will. 
Mr.  Chairman,  I  do  not  have  any  other  questions.  I  really  think 
if  this  continues,  what  the  two  of  us  saw  when  bringing  our  own 
States into the communications system will fail because we are the 
end  of  the  system.  We  receive  more  traffic  than  we  originate,  and 
the burden on our people of receiving these messages from outside 
our  States  really  means  that  these  legacy  carriers  cannot  continue 
to  operate.  They  do  not  have  a  17  percent  profit  to  start  with.  So 
if  you  have  a  17  percent  burden  on  the  average,  in  terms  of  this 
phantom  traffic  which  they  must  deliver  under  current  FCC  rules, 
they  are  destined  for  failure.  Above  all,  they  are  destined  not  be 
in  a  position  to  do  what  we  want  them  to  do  and  that  is  deploy 
broadband. 

I hope that we will find some way to get the FCC involved in this 
and  get  the  industry  that  is  going  to  pay  the  price  ultimately  be-
cause if our people fail, you are still going to have to find some way 
to  deliver  your  messages.  Unless  you  have  the  legacy  carriers  sur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

vive, you have to find some way to deliver them, and I do not know 
you would do it under the existing system. And you cannot say that 
Sprint  can  deliver  anywhere  in  the  world  or  any  of  the  rest  of  you 
can  deliver  anywhere  in  the  world  if  you  cannot  deliver  right  here 
at home in terms of these small carriers in rural America. 

Mr. Chairman, do you have any questions? 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes. I would like to ask Mr. Henagan a question. 

How many people do you employ? 

Mr. HENAGAN. On the telephone side, I employ nine people. 
The CHAIRMAN. What is your gross income? 
Mr. HENAGAN. It is $1.6 million. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  And  according  to  your  testimony,  11  percent  of 
the  calls  would  be  phantom  traffic.  What  is  the  dollar  value  of 
that? 

Mr.  HENAGAN.  On  a  per  access  line  basis,  it  is  $37  per  access 

line. 

The CHAIRMAN. $7 per call? 
Mr. HENAGAN. $37 per an access line. It is about $63,000 a year 
on  my  company  as  such  for  that  today  as  such.  And  if  you  look  at 
it over a 10-year period—and I have looked back over a 10-year pe-
riod—it would be over a half a million dollars for a very small com-
pany. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  And  other  small  companies  have  had  20  or  30 

percent of their traffic as being phantom? 

Mr.  HENAGAN.  That  is  correct.  As  a  whole,  it  is  anywhere  from 

10 to 30 percent today that is coming in as phantom traffic. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  So  this  will  mean  depriving  some  of  your  fellow 

workers a pay raise. 

Mr. HENAGAN. That is correct. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, sir. 
Senator  STEVENS.  There  is  a  difference  here  between  the  phan-
tom traffic and those messages that are missing billing information 
my staff tells me. There is a double problem here. One is the billing 
information has been stripped off. The other is phantom. Never had 
it. 

Mr.  HENAGAN.  That  is  correct.  Some  of  them  we  never  get 
records  whatsoever,  and  then  some  of  them  we  get  records  in  that 
have  no  billing  information  so  that  I  have  no  idea  who  to  bill  for 
that  call.  So  out  of  that,  the  tandem  sends  me  the  records  and  I 
have  nobody  to  bill  for  some,  and  then  the  other  is  we  have  no 
records at all that ever come in. 

Senator STEVENS. Ms. Simpson, after we had the original hearing 
in  this  room  on  our  rate  integration  concept,  the  industry  got  to-
gether  and  came  up  with  the  interstate  rate  pool.  It  did  not  take 
an  action  of  the  Federal  Government.  It  did  not  take  an  action  of 
the  FCC.  They  started  the  process  toward  change  to  accommodate 
the  problems  that  were  faced  by  the  fact  that  we  had  two  new 
States. Is it possible that industry could get together, in your opin-
ion, and try to work this out without Federal regulation or without 
interference of Congress? 

Ms.  SIMPSON.  I  believe  that  it  is  possible  and  that  the  industry 
should  work  together.  I  mean,  to  be  clear,  the  VON  Coalition—we 
do  support  reasonable  call  signaling  obligations  for  interconnected 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

VoIP  providers  where  it  is  technically  feasible  and  operationally 
feasible as well. 

Senator STEVENS. What about where it is not and you are the re-

ceiving carrier? Do you have to deliver it anyway? 

Ms. SIMPSON. Well, that becomes the situation where there needs 
to be a cost-benefit analysis, what is the size of the phantom traffic 
problem  versus  what  is  the  cost  of  having  VoIP  providers  modify 
all their networks to be able to provide the information the way the 
rural  carriers  want  it,  and  then  the  corresponding  problems  with 
the  economy,  broadband  deployment,  and  just  regulation  of  the 
Internet.  So  I  mean,  there  is  definitely  a  cost-benefit  analysis  that 
has to be undertaken on a broader scope. 

Senator STEVENS. I am reading between the lines that you think 

Congress is going to have to solve this problem. 

Ms. SIMPSON. No. I definitely believe that there are ways for the 
industry to do it on their own and that there are ways for the FCC 
to  do  it  within  their  current  authority  and  their  current  expertise 
to help fix the problem. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  these  terminating  carriers  want  to  be 
paid  for  the  phantom  traffic  at  the  same  rate  that  they  are  paid 
for  all  other  traffic  that  comes  through  their  system.  You  are  say-
ing you think that you should be able to enter into some agreement 
where that is not the case. You said handle the traffic the way they 
want it. How should they handle it? 

Ms.  SIMPSON.  According  to  the  legacy  telecommunications  indus-
try  billing  standards.  It  is  difficult  to  retrofit  Internet  voice  prod-
ucts,  and  when  we  are  talking  about  voice  products,  there  are  so 
many  different  kinds.  It  is  not  necessarily  the  type  that  Sprint 
would  provide  or  Covad  would  provide.  We  are  talking  about  VoIP 
applications  that  do  not  even  have  any  need  whatsoever  for  a 
phone  number,  which  would  be  one  of  the  main  parts  of  informa-
tion that rural carriers would want for billing purposes. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, it would seem to me that the FCC could 
require  that  no  system  could  launch  such  a  message  without  some 
identifying  mark  to  see  who  is  going  to  be  billed  for  delivering  it. 
Is that wrong? 

Ms. SIMPSON. It is not necessarily wrong. I think it is one of the 

things that the FCC is currently working on. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, that is new technology. That is what you 
have  the  luxury  of  in  the  major  cities  that  they  do  not  have  the 
luxury  of  in  Missouri  and  in  some  of  the  rural  States  and  places 
like I live. 

Ms.  SIMPSON.  There  is  also  a  difference,  Senator  Stevens,  be-
tween  the  potential  for  having  interconnected  VoIP  providers  have 
to implement two different solutions, a temporary solution based on 
the  existing  intercarrier  compensation  regime,  which  would  cost 
money  for  the  VoIP  industry  to  implement,  and  then  presuming 
that the FCC, since it does have a proceeding open and it is work-
ing  on  it  right  now,  does  do  comprehensive  intercarrier  compensa-
tion reform, then the VoIP industry has to turn around and imple-
ment yet another solution at yet another additional expense. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, that implies that there is one solution for 
the  areas  where  you  have  a  monstrous  number  of  messages  and  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

different  solution  for  the  areas  where  you  have  a  smaller  number 
in rural America. 

Mr.  McKee,  do  you  agree  with  that,  that  there  is  a  difference  in 
the  system  where  you  are  integrating  between  those  entities  who 
have  already  gone  to  broadband  and  been  modernized  and  those 
that  integrate  with  the  legacy  carriers  that  are  still  on  the 
wirelines? 

Mr. MCKEE. Let me try to answer your question, and if I do not 
do  it  right,  I  am  sure  you  will  let  me  know.  But  I  think  what  you 
are asking—— 

Senator STEVENS. I used tubes once, remember? 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  MCKEE.—well,  as  I  understand  your  question,  you  are  say-
ing,  well,  should  these  two  systems  be  treated  differently  and  I 
would say no, absolutely not. In fact, one of the things that we real-
ly  hope  the  FCC  will  do  is  to  try  and  unify  the  way  in  which  all 
these  systems  are  treated  so  that  there  can  be  one  uniform  set  of 
rules that applies to everyone. 

One  of  the  problems  we  have  right  now  is  that  there  is  not  just 
one rate that is applied when you hand traffic to a carrier. In fact, 
there  are  nine  or  more  different  categories  of  rates  that  apply  de-
pending  upon  whether  you  are  a  wireless  carrier,  whether  you  are 
a  long  distance  carrier,  whether  you  are  another  CLEC,  whether 
you  are  an  ILEC,  you  know,  the  distance  of  the  call.  So  there  are 
a number of different rates here. 

And what we would really hope to see is that the FCC addresses 
the  thing  in  such  a  way  that  both  IP  providers,  VoIP  providers,  it 
does not matter what kind of telecommunications you provide, you 
have  an  obligation  to  pay  and  it  is  some  kind  of  straightforward, 
easily calculated rate that everybody knows they are going to have 
to pay, including pay to rural carriers. 

Senator  STEVENS.  The  intercarrier  compensation  proceeding  has 

been pending before the FCC for 7 years now. 

Mr. MCKEE. That is correct. 
Senator  STEVENS.  How  do  you  think  we  are  going  to  get  an  an-

swer to this question in time for these rural carriers to survive? 

Mr.  MCKEE.  Well,  I  believe,  Senator,  you  can  probably  bring 

some pressure on the FCC to do what they need to do. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  think  I  can  bring  greater  pressure  on  you 
guys who are making all the money to find some way to pass some 
of it on to the people who are failing. Certainly this is an industry 
problem more than it is an FCC problem. The industry is carrying 
messages  that  it  knows  will  not  be  compensated  for  because  the 
billing  information  is  not  there,  regardless  of  whether  it  was  de-
leted  or  just  not  there  to  begin  with.  They  are  passing  it  on.  I 
would  put  the  burden  on  whoever  passes  on  a  message  that  does 
not have that information, that they should pay from there on. 

And  I  think  that  the  industry  ought  to  find  some  way  to  get  to-
gether before that happens because I do believe we cannot wait for 
7 years for this to be solved. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  do  not  have  any  more  questions.  Do  you  have 

any more questions? 

The  CHAIRMAN.  This  may  sound  naı¨ve,  but  Mr.  McKee,  if  Mr. 
Henagan’s  company  goes  bankrupt  with  nine  employees  and  $1.6 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

million in income and it gets worse and worse, would your company 
be willing to take over the system? 

Mr. MCKEE. Well, again, Senator, we have no desire for his com-
pany to go bankrupt. In fact, we are more than willing to pay them 
for the traffic that we send them. 

Again,  Sprint—I  can  only  speak  to  my  company—does  populate 
identifying information for all traffic it sends to the PSTN, and we 
stand  ready  to  compensate  rural  carriers  for  the  traffic  we  send 
them. 

We  also  contribute  a  significant  amount  of  money  to  the  Uni-
versal Service Fund to also help support those carriers, and I think 
that is certainly useful—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  Do  not  say  you  contribute.  You  said  that  be-
fore. That is not so. It is the user that pays that. That is a charge 
that  the  customer  pays.  It  is  not  paid  by  the  company  at  all.  You 
just  transmit  the  money  that  has  been  collected  under  Universal 
Service charges added to each customer’s charge. That is not some-
thing you pay in the industry at all. And I have heard that several 
times  in  recent  hearings  here  about  how  the  industry  is  paying 
those.  The  consumer  is  paying  those  and  has  from  the  very  begin-
ning.  It  was  an  addition  to  interstate  calls  and  it  was  the  result 
of  that  conference  we  had  on  rate  integration,  but  it  is  not  some-
thing that is paid by the company. It does not come out of your top 
or  your  bottom  line.  It  is  something  that  is  paid  by  the  individual 
into  that  Fund.  That  is  not  your  money.  You  did  not  earn  it,  and 
you did not pay it. So I hope you do not say to me again. OK? 

Mr. MCKEE.—absolutely, Senator. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
Anything further, sir? 
The CHAIRMAN. No. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you all very much. I am going to intro-
duce  the  bill.  I  am  not  sure  yet  whether  it  is  going  to  go  very  far 
after  what  I  have  heard  from  you  all,  but  I  do  hope  we  will  find 
some solution. Otherwise, rural carriers are going to go out of exist-
ence. They cannot continue to get these messages that they cannot 
identify,  they  cannot  bill,  and  yet  have  the  duty  under  the  FCC 
current regulations to deliver without regard to being paid by any-
body. It just will not work. 

Thank you very much. 
[Whereupon, at 3:35 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 
Chairman  Inouye,  thank  you  for  holding  today’s  hearing  on  the  subject  of  ‘‘phan-
tom traffic.’’ I regret that I am not able to attend the hearing due to my obligations 
as presiding officer in the Senate. 

I  want  to  thank  you  and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  for  inviting  a  Missouri  witness 
to  testify.  Mr.  Raymond  Henagan,  General  Manager  of  Rock  Port  Telephone  Com-
pany, has presented a compelling case as to why the Federal Communications Com-
mission  needs  to  address  the  problem  of  ‘‘phantom  traffic’’  on  our  communications 
networks.  I  would  be  remiss  to  not  also  thank  you  for  inviting  Mr.  Charles  McKee 
from Sprint Nextel Corporation to testify. I often claim Sprint Nextel as a Missouri 
company because its headquarters is located just across the state line in Kansas and 
it is one of the largest private employers in the Kansas City metropolitan area. 

Phantom traffic refers to telephone calls which do not contain identifying informa-
tion  that  can  be  used  for  billing  purposes  between  voice  service  providers.  As  the 
amount  of  phantom  traffic  has  grown  due  to  new  technologies,  so  has  the  impact 
on  the  bottom  line  of  telephone  companies.  Rural  telephone  companies  have  been 
especially  impacted.  According  to  one  estimate  by  the  National  Exchange  Carrier 
Association (NECA), phantom traffic has resulted in annual losses of approximately 
$600 million for rural carriers and $2 billion for the industry overall. 

I  know  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  is  looking  closely  at  proposals 
to  address  phantom  traffic  and  has  received  comments  on  various  proposals  from 
the  wireless,  cable,  and  voice  providers.  I  am  hopeful  today’s  hearing  sends  a  mes-
sage  to  the  FCC  and  industry  that  they  must  work  constructively  to  come  to  an 
agreement.  We  need  clarity  and  fair  rules  to  identify  traffic  traveling  over  our  Na-
tion’s telecommunications network. 

Thank you again for holding today’s hearing. 

Æ 

(31) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:47 Jul 17, 2012 Jkt 075047 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75047.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

